To further this, I believe in the Ayn Rand concept of “personal greed is good” but only to a point. There are unscrupulous people in the world who aren’t in it for their own gain by the rules, but rather will lie, cheat, steal and seriously damage others. Pure capitalism is fine if we all are on the same page, but to not recognize that oversight is required (like referees in sporting events) is just silly. Yes, we’ve had too much regulation in the past. Usually it’s regulation about the wrong things for the wrong reasons. But we’ve seen basic regulations removed to the point to where it’s almost every person for themselves and Caveat Emptor seems like a quaint little poem.
Despite predictions of a “horror budget,” the Budget isn’t overly dramatic, although, depending on your own circumstances there are some significant changes.
On July 23, 2011 I stopped taking my BC, Charles and I were ready to start a family! We prayed, and prayed and prayed many many times that God would be incontrol of the whole process and eventually give us a happy, healthy baby. After being off the pill for a month and successfully having a visit from "Aunt Flo" we began "trying" hahaha yeah that's how i'm going to put it, that was August 22,2011. On September 23, I was "late" and said "well maybe I should take a test... and I did, and it popped up PREGNANT! To my shock and amazement I woke up Charles and proceeded to test about 5 more times within the following week. WE WERE OVERJOYED !!! This was the perfect time for us and we truly felt blessed for such a short time trying and such great results.
Cost so far: 168 gold
2. A survey of church records relating to individual priests against whom allegations of abuse had been made.
If you have any other questions, don't hesitate to contact me! This Amazing Offer is only good through November 30th so act now! I'd love to have you on my team of stampers!
Iranian journalist Masih Alinejad said Shokraye's sentence was due to Iranian authorities' lack of tolerance towards any form of criticism – in cartoons, newspaper articles and the arts.
The Holly Jolly costs only $10, or $8 for students. We’ll be taking over Argyle Fine Art at its new Barrington Street location on Thursday December 8, from 6pm to 9pm. There are many door prizes to give away, and once again we’ll have excellent catering from Certainly Cinnamon. In the spirit of the season, we ask that Holly Jolly’ers bring a non-perishable food item(s) to support the Parker Street Food and Furniture Bank.
Where will be the Park Slope shop be located?
This cutie is Cherry Lucy, she's sitting on the Spring Bench from on older release, and the cherries hanging from the corner of the image have been made with the new CC Cutter Cherry Die, coloured with Copics. The sentiment is from the Berry Logos set.
So, we’ll see if it’s an actually skeptical perspective or just anger/dislike denier/fallen faithful.
The Amur tiger and African lion roared and snored during my visit to Brookfield Zoo.
My crock pot is a favorite cold weather cooking appliance. I'm not sure why I don't use it as much in the warm weather but I just don't seem to. But the versatility of it really can't be beat. At my house, we are big fans of Olive Garden soups. Chicken Gnocchi, Zuppa Di Toscana. Love them!! So, this soup was inspired by those soups.
The problem starts with the box the gloves are kept in. Watch next time you are in a hospital. How many people wash their hands before they plunge them in to pull out a glove? What happens to the germs on that that hand? They go on to the surface of next glove in the box -- the surface that is going to be in contact with the next patient. I talked about this with my dentist (as he scratched his nose with his gloved hand). He was graphic in his description of the possibilities for germ transmission . It's not that the gloves are useless, and they genuinely do protect the professionals from our body fluids, but they also make them feel as clean on the outside of the glove as they are on the inside, and that simply isn't the case. The same goes for everyone involved in cleaning and maintenance in medical settings. Unless they change their gloves between tasks, there is no reason to think that you are any better protected from other patients' germs than you would be if the staff had bare hands.
The new paradigm. I have written about this before, the new catch phrases that define the new crop of people in charge. Proactive, Adminisphere, etc.
- Please link directly to your entry not just to your blog or gallery.
MBAHAMAZ PAUL
They all handled the transplanting with no problems at all!﻿ After doing more reading on growing celery I learned that celery loves the cool weather. I'm in the process of making a "shade shelter" to give it a break from the very hot sun coming up.
Susan Harris (REP) 7.93% 405
I feel like I’ve changed quite a bit since I last wrote. I’m in one of those moods where I could just delete every post I’ve ever made and start fresh, because, perhaps I wrote about things that have nothing to do with art or music previous to now, and I want this blog to have a focus. That and, at this particular moment, I really don’t feel a need to save the world, or conquer it, or what have you. I just wish to exist in my own space as an artist/vocalist, I’m grateful for that and it’s enough on my plate for now.
Plan, but Don't Stress
Had been built years ago
What's the beer all about then? If you must know, then it's caramel in a three piece suit with a buttery bow tie demanding a malty hit or else it's off to the adjunct fields with you, low-class picker and strummer. If there's a hit packed into this pint sized lager it's that it drinks down rather smooth and quick. Kinda like sunshine on the rocks makes your belly dance the las dos rosas.
What we need civil society organizations to do is discuss, civilly, their points of view, their decisions, and their goals. And to structure themselves to be able to do so. This requires thinking about the constitution and skills of their staffs, boards, and advisors, the way they provide access to their key decision makers, and the ways they engage with critics and supporters in the real context in which those things will happen, not in some nostalgic early 20th century institutionally-bound model.
Hi Team!
Length: 9½ miles/6 hours (including 1½-2 hours to explore Lullingstone Roman Villa)
And a note, which read:
On the way back I piloted the plane, a little bit. We have had a bare foot deboarding again. On top of this the rain started really picking up. So by the time actually went on the road with our jump started van it was pouring and everything, including the inside the van, was wet. Likely the drive was short – just till the town of Coldfoot, AK.
I am doing a Grand Tour Trip in Ireland @ the moment.
Mandatory entry
Then he was out.
On Saturday night we celebrated Mother's Day as well as our brother-in-law's birthday with my husband's family. We had a fun bbq with grilled burgers and hotdogs, and loads of yummy salads. I was in charge of making the dessert. I wanted to make a cake because there was a birthday, but I also wanted to do something different that no one had ever eaten. Enter this cake! It is so easy to make and everyone LOVED it, including all of the little kids. And who wouldn't? The cake combined with the pudding turns into a smooth and creamy bite of heaven. And the crushed up Oreos on the top add a little bit of extra crunch and texture. Everyone kept saying over and over how much they loved this cake. Even our little four-year-old niece inhaled it and she's hard to please! This is a crowd pleaser for sure.
There were few ethnic strifes or conflicts during Silla’s long history unlike Balhae whose fault-lines were exposed within a hundred years of its founding leading to political instability and its eventual downfall.
Yet regardless how they acknowledge the presence of the truth, they do bend it, and because it is theatre, that bending is accepted. That there were no modern clocks to strike the hour in ancient Rome does not weaken Shakespeare's Julius Caesar one wit. Ditto Hamlet attending a university founded 700 years after his time. The membrane grows thin when you hit a monologue, a play in which the writer is portraying a character with the same name, you tend to believe that this is the truth. But I've also read a lot of Hunter Thompson, and I doubt the everything reported about the adventures of Hunter Thompson, writer, written by Hunter Thompson, writer, is absolute truth. It does not stop stop the enjoyment factor, though I would hesitate to quote him in an argument.
The year 1968 was a turning point for a generation coming of age and a nation at war; and throughout it all, the Bay Area was at the forefront with an emerging California counterculture. Tune in, turn on and drop out - after the failures of 1968 and 1969, a lot of my generation felt that there was nowhere else to turn.
With her bright red lips, peroxide blonde hair and upbeat music, being a popstar comes annoyingly naturally to the young 21 year old singer/songwriter.. She’s joining LoveBox this summer, she’s been linked to Rob Kardashian and musician Drake and rapper Jay-Z says she’s the next Rihanna.
But, second, in response to what Rick said, when we balanced the budget with the 1997 Balanced Budget Act, and ultimately had four consecutive balanced budgets, we doubled the size of the National Institutes of Health because we set priorities. It is possible to do the right things in the right order to make this a bigger, richer, more exciting country.
I was never a girly girl. Recent studies have shown otherwise.
"It's your Manhattan, and there's Central Park."
And that is exactly when I stopped myself today and giggled at myself. What a multitasking robot have I become?
Across the red sands, Sabb'asch, Asab’at, and Max emerge from cover of the wagon. Sabb'asch calmly dispatches the still dazed young zrné with three shots from his rifle.
So I created these ULTIMATE collections of new Slides and Ladders games for my students to practice their addition and subtraction facts. They don't even need flash cards!
I am SO making this recipe soon:
But then I was at my husband’s soccer game this past Tuesday. It was the Eastern finals, one game away from State Championship, and you could tell both sides wanted the win BAD. Our team goes up 1-0. Then, they come back and tie it up. Then right before the end of the first half, they take the lead 2-1. They have momentum, they have the edge, but my husband’s boys never stopped fighting. Even when a freakish call in the box ejects our goalie for two seconds, and one penalty kick later, we're down two goals. Even when the clock went to fifteen, then ten, then five minutes left. Even when some of the fans gave up and left the stadium, my husband’s boys never relented. They fought until the last second.
Or, as Elisabeth said when we walked through the door, “This is da’wa!”
OK so to wrap it up, terminator stout, good. Oak aged terminator stout on nitro tap, f'ing epicly heavily good. Like Michael j Fox heavy. 4 and 5 stars respectively. If you are in portland ever these are beers to drink while you are there, however I can not guarantee weather or not the nitro will be available as I was told this was a special release that they got a couple days prior.
No one reads copy anymore.
Before long a glossy concept magazine packed with ads surfaced on the newsstands, and the whole mvoement devolved into one more mildly exotic lifestyle choice for bored yuppies who were tired of the older options for conspicuous consumption and wanted to try a new one. Not simplicity, but a set of abstract cultural representations of simplicity that were heavily marketed to sell products, became the hallmark of the movement, as torrents of overpriced goodies manufactured in Third World sweatshops and marketed through lavish catalogs and websites came to define what had started out as a not unreasonable attempt to raise questions about the contemporary cult of clutter. What Thoreau would have thought of all this, while stepping out of his shack at Walden Pond with an ax in his hand to split firewood in the chill October air, does not bear imagining.
Seeing this was the first instance of such an occurrence that I can recall, I would imagine this might be examined by the FIA and technical directive issues asking teams to place this item in a more secure position to protect it and track officials from a similar incident.
They do not worry in any sense about the impact of Zimbabwe's final collapse on our neighbours. They are only concerned about one thing - how to hold on to their total control of the state and thereby protect their standard of living and personal security.
The final fucking episode. The final fight. Between the leader and follower, the comrades, the childhood friends, the bitter enemies, between the main character and the traitor antagonist, between fucking Shu and fucking Gai, and THAT is you resolve that fight?
But I was me. In 2011. Pregnant with my first child. Long time married to my best friend and quite possibly the most wonderful man in the world (regardless of the fact that he's still unable to pronounce 'vegetable' and sucks at keeping secrets from me, even about presents he's bought for me). Educated and informed. Pretty well off. And most importantly, able to devote almost every single second of my life, every day now and in the future, to bringing up my child into happy and healthy adulthood and making sure all is well with her.
So when Sara and I met up to chat last week, I asked her how her move went (she'd recently tweeted that moving with a 2yo was actually worse than moving preggers), and she asked me how my WIP was coming (I'd been tweeting about being thisclose to done). We sat down, having never seen each other face-to-face, and continued a conversation that had already been started elsewhere. And later, when I packed up my bag and we parted ways, the conversation didn't end. It picked up again on Twitter (I mentioned that my train was delayed and Sara shot back her apologies).
The second dip is more of a Texas classic with a funny name. Texas Caviar Dip was actually invented by a New York chef who moved to Dallas to work at Neiman Marcus, but had no clue what to do with black eyed peas. She eventually came up with this simple, affordable dip that the rich customers just loved!
There's some truly bizarre facial hair involved here. Still, Belgian musos The Praetors knock out some killer melodic punk rock on their debut single 'Pink' which spent five weeks in the Belgian top 30 in July/August 1980. The B-side is quite different and hints at the ska-ish sound that developed on later records. Most of those later records were on the Monopole label which is revered amongst fake punk enthusiasts for releasing Bobby Ranger's sublime 'Punke Punke' and King Louis' police siren fueled noise-fest 'The Fuzz On My Bag'.
We are all one, we are the colors that make the grand painting
A Cuban doctor, Angel Felipe, agreed.
Sam and Danno have great onscreen chemistry, not unlike his relationship with McGarrett. Comescu escapes a car crash, with the vials…those guys really are like cockroaches. And in case you missed that little nugget (it was mentioned so quickly) they made smallpox more deadly. Once a lucky bugger didn’t save Comescu a second time. It’s nice the way Sam and Callen care for each other (you have to listen to the byplay to catch it). Come to Hawaii and eat t a shrimp truck…seems a bit anti-climactic to me and when are they going to realize they have to go to LA? Oh, here it comes. Just when you thought it was over, turns out what Comescu had was only saline. The real bad guy boarded a plane and has just touched down in LA with nine vials of extra-deadly smallpox.
oil
Hands up, confessions and sackcloth all round: yes, I’ve been sniffy about celeb biographies. Well, I’m a convert now, and I don’t even care if they’re ghosted or not. I went on my Easter hols to remote Colonsay and I thought I’d take along a little light gossip, so along came Russell Brand and Jade Goody. And what do you know, I loved ’em both. It turns out that celeb memoirs work the same way for me as books of any genre – the crucial thing is the truth of it all.
Also seen in this after photo you get a sneak peek of the new floors here in the after shot. More to come on that later!
Sure enough, he was nursing the beginning of a black eye.
“But Mike!” all of Ellen’s blog readers squeal in protest. “You’re not a hater! …um, are you? I only know you via the internet, after all, so maybe you are? I don’t know…” Well, I like to think I’m not, but to be frank I’ve indulged in my share of bad attitude. And maybe there’s not all that much to be done about it in the end, because, well, life is just much bigger than any single piece of 20/20 hindsight. Still, advice aimed toward one’s younger self can be relevant to one’s future self too, right? And “don’t be a hater,” despite my fondness for the verbiage, is reductive.
GPATS has lots of projects going. LOTS. And some of them, for instance, are fairly obvious to me. Fairforest Way, for instance, is the home of the local UPS hub. It is also the main road leading to Cavalier Drive, home of Christ Church Episcopal School, where the affluent kids of Greenville are educated. Thus, Fairforest Way rates a big road project. Our tax money is therefore paying to maintain a main thoroughfare for wealthy private-school kids and staggeringly-wealthy private-industry. How many of Greenville's citizens will this road actually serve? Is this ethical? And still another project will insure ICAR has good access roads, since of course we all know Clemson's partners in this endeavor, Microsoft and BMW, can't afford to build their own. (Link to GPATS pdf file detailing these projects)
Like anywhere, Fiji uses the uniqueness of its culture to entertain visitors, who are entranced with kava (traditional narcotic drink), mekes (traditional dances), and lovo (earth oven / meal cooked in an earth oven). Unlike a lot of other tourist spots, Fijians seem much more engaged with these traditions and truly use them and live them in their lives. It’s not just a show.
There are the daily rituals --
The thing is none of these kids do the work! A few do, but it’s almost like I want to grab them by the shoulders and shake them into action. They show up late, don’t show up, don’t study, or don’t do the work. They end up failing and getting below a 2.5 GPA.
Well, your time has arrived, dear Gemini. This week, the Sun enters your sign boosting your energy, giving you an opportunity to recharge your batteries for the rest of the year. Yay! In particular, it will inexplicably attract people and opportunities to you. (Milk this for all its worth because this doesn't happen all the time.) For example, the next month is the only time all year when the Sun will be in Gemini. This also marks the beginning of your personal year (birthday to birthday), so it certainly behooves you to develop a rough expectation of what you want this year to be all about. (It never hurts to have a plan, Stan.) What's it going to be?
We made it back from Jamaica, boy did the week fly by, just was not enough time. We had an awesome time. We met a lot of nice people, ate lots of delicious food, and got some much need R & R!
Perhaps the most harrowing incident resulting from one of Casey’s practical jokes occurred on a Sunday when he barged into a hotel room armed with a revolver loaded with blanks and fired away at a bull rider pal who was in bed with a woman.
Rather than be dismayed, I decided that I could do a better job of translating my mental image to reality. I had had great successs with wide leg pants before, so why not go one step further? So I headed out to my local fabric store to pick up some stretch denim and set about drafting a pattern for these beauties. The idea I had in mind was a 1940's casual look, but I wanted them to translate into all kinds of other styles. Much of the success or failure of this idea depends on the accessories employed in this endeavour.
7. I drive a previously loved car - that needs snow tired BADLY!! lol
NEVER lose a holy curiosity. (Albert Einstein)
Those of you who know me personally know that I dubiously started a exercise program recently on the recommendation of a friend. She knew what she was talking about. I am now officially hooked. That said, I am continually frustrated by my lack of strength, agility, endurance, etc. Last night's workout called for the building of certain new skills that I found particularly challenging. After it was over, I forced myself to work for a few minutes on a different skill which I also am struggling to develop: a box jump of a certain height.
The glory of God is present tense for the believer. It is the glory of God that saved you. The glory of God makes a way for sinful man to be born of the Spirit of God. The glory of God is when He manifests Himself to mankind.
Find Choice Rookie Cards inserted every other pack! Look for a Choice Reserve Parallel Card in every pack!
For example, when asked to appear before a Commons select committee to explain the company’s failure to honour its promises, Kraft chairman and CEO Irene Rosenfeld refused. ‘Appearing before the panel was not the best use of my personal time,’ she said.
1- My partner
“…..In the spring of 1955, Afghan mobs were permitted if not encouraged by the authorities to tear down the flag from Pakistan Embassy in Kabul, and from its consulates in Jalallabad and Kandhar and to loot these establishments. Pakistan promptly withdrew its ambassador, suspended Afghanistan’s transit privileges, and unleashed its own mob-violence against Afghan businesses and officials in Pakistan. The border remained closed for five months, until the United States finally prevailed on Pakistani’s to allow transit of US aid materials and equipment to Helmund Valley. The United States turned down as impracticable, however, an Afghan request to build over a thousand miles of highway through Iran to give Afghanistan an alternative route to the sea.” Unquote In my view now a reversal of situation has morphed. The killing of Osama Bin Laden in Abbottabd did not elicit any reaction from President Dmitry Medvedev of Russia. The million dollar question is why? What about Viladmir Putin? His studied silence is eloquent. It was Bin Laden who organized Jihad against U.S.S.R in 1980. The reason is obvious. First and foremost, Russia now has been able to persuade the Islamists in Russia that they should delink themselves from Al-Qaeda. Russia in fact is turning a blind eye to the Russian Islamists getting financial support from other sources.
Credits
I wonder if the price of yet another Euro bailout of Greece could be the transfer of the remaining portion of the Parthenon to London where it could be reunited with that removed by Lord Elgin to the British Museum for safekeeping and the whole rebuilt in the East End after the Olympics have moved on?
The drive to institutionalise clients has also contributed to this, which is why a lot of partners are really just senior account managers. It’s only odd that lawyers then scratch their heads and ask why clients struggle to differentiate them. But the upside is that there are less loony, racist, bullying, sexual harassing, alcoholics kicking around the Square Mile, so it’s swings and roundabouts really.
As we get to see the Crown Princess’ body in the water it suddenly changes to a man’s – Lee Gak dressed in modern garments – dead body floating in water. Hm. What could it mean?
So I havent been able to run like I like for the past 3 weeks
$1,200 obo
Watch as a few dozen improbably handsome dudes with made-up sounding names and jobs profess that they’ve found a magical connection! Marvel as sweet blond Emily searches for true love, or at least a gig on “Dancing with the Stars!” Drink every time one of the suitors says “journey,” “fairy tale” or accuses another guy of “not being there for Emily!"
just wondering, what is your tattoo anyway?
I hate spirituality, at least as it has come to be used in these contexts. Spirituality is a weasel word, impossible to define or pin down. It can, and does, refer to pretty much anything. The only thing that it seems to mean with certainty is the absence of the disciplined, regular, organized spiritual seeking that is so essential to religious belief and moral behavior.
Team with the worst cards: Padres. The Melendez card is cute, but it's about the only thing that stood out (Jerald Clark card is pretty good though)
After all, who would have imagined a year ago that Tunisians and Egyptians would oust their dictators?
I started at the Darley Anderson Agency, which is one of the bigger independent agencies. I was Darley Anderson’s PA, then Agency Manager, then became an agent, then later Head of Children’s Books.
That those you love are hundreds of miles away..
5 fresh mushrooms, finely chopped
Incidentally – conversations like this are more likely if AMHPs and police officers work in an area where managers have declined to ensure there is a local protocol which covers who will do what and when. Police managers who try to do so may wish to reflect on why mental health services will sometimes train inpatient nurses to use control and restraint techniques which are deliberately designed to be therapeutically appropriate; whilst community nurses are most usually not trained. I still cannot work out why this is the case when physical coercion may needed in both contexts.
Our unity is to be the sign, the way, that the world will know that the Father sent Jesus to the world. What a shame it is that so many are so worried about their own personal desires, and are so not worried about what God or the world thinks, that they cause all this discord in the churches. They seem to have no fear of God, to be totally unaware of their selfishness and lack of true faith, and in fact often are proud of and flaunt their “religiosity” and hold high positions in the church. They are so self deceived that they are unaware of the judgment that faces us all and are confident they will be found pleasing to God.
Radio Raheem played and if memory serves me correct they barely got half way through their set before the fucking cops shut it down. Playing with Radio Raheem back then was for us a real treat as finally we didn't feel like the black sheep of Long Island music. In them we found sonic and spiritual brothers. Also they gave a whole new meaning to being eastern Long Island band. I mean fucking Quogue? Soundly I didn't sound as out east anymore being from Rocky Point. They had me beat by another 45 minutes east bound for sure. They eventually changed their name to Rahim and released a couple of records on French Kiss, however still managed to rule. Even though they stopped playing "Aloha" (and the rest of the Radio Raheem era tunes). Though, props for them actually playing "Aloha" when the opened for Les Savy Fav at the Bowery Ballroom.
On that blog I found this organization who shares my passion for giving a child, the best in toys and literature. Basically, they’ve done my job for me, thanks! Here they are: http://parents-choice.org/aboutpcf.cfm
Amazon approached the six largest U.S. trade book publishers earlier this year to seek their participation in the program. By all accounts, each refused. Small wonder. Publishers aren’t eager to allow Amazon to undermine the economics of the e-book market, representing the lone bright spot for the industry, by permitting an estimated two to five million Amazon Prime customers to start downloading e-books for free. So books from the Big Six publishers – Random House, Simon & Schuster, Penguin, HarperCollins, Hachette, and Macmillan – are not in the Library Lending program.
In a small bowl combine the dry filling ingredients, set aside. Melt butter and brush over the surface over the dough. Sprinkle with the dry filling ingredients. Begin rolling dough on long side, jellyroll fashion, pinching seams together to seal. Cut the roll into 12 equal pieces. Place cut side up, in a 9-10 inch large deep pan that has been greased. Slightly press down each roll.
—A Story, A Story, retold and illlustrated by Gail E. Hailey, won the Caldecott in 1971—the tale of how Anansi wins the stories from the Sky God, who has been hoarding them.
Taans: It’s fascinating to see how quickly Auster has gone, in your view, from being an indispensible mentor to Tel Aviv’s Satanic puppet. I suggest that this speaks to nothing but the rapidity of your descent into Jew-hatred. Since this occurred recently and so quickly, I’ll hold out some hope that it’s a passing phase.
Nomads is one of the most atmospheric restaurants I have ever visited. It is decadently designed like a sultans harem with large mattresses and pillows, private booths with huge sofa's separated by curtains. Nomads comes complete with ambient and Arabian music and on some nights even a belly dancer. The cuisine is Middle Eastern/North African and you wine and dine reclining while hot and cold mezzes are served to you on a platter.
Like contractions. Loads of contractions.
David J. Scow – Busted in Buttown
Though I am not a practicing Christian, I was raised in a Christian home and go to church on high holidays; and the Bible is among the spiritual texts that feed my inner life. To me, the famous Psalm 23: “The Lord is my Shepherd, I shall not want,” speaks of the way we return to wholeness when we turn our hearts to the divine. Wanting ceases. We feel fulfilled in the moment because we are, in truth, in a unified state with pure consciousness, rather than temporarily believing that we are lost, divided and alone.
Now I said at the beginning that all of those questions would have but one answer. Let’s check it out.
Sorry, sorry, digressing there. The blog is about D&D so we should talk about D&D.
I find what could be the longest line for the bathroom ever…and queue up.
According to a psychological study done, only 1 in 5 people can take what they learn from one discipline and apply to other disciplines. To a large extent the objective of education is to teach us theorums and formulae that can be used to solve different types of problems. To apply wisdom from one activity to another requires lateral thinking, imagination, and dedication.
Message to Pretty
Or do you even know what is it like to be you,
(Pheonix News Wire) — A military separation hearing was scheduled today for a Camp Pendleton-based Marine sergeant facing discharge on “other than honorable” conditions for his “Armed Forces Tea Party” Facebook page and criticism of the president.
Where she interned: New York Times News Service
I couldn’t help but notice the entire house held a deep, vast silence that felt entirely inescapable. Each room, each corridor I had previously visited contributed to this feeling. Only the staircase betrayed the wide expanse of nothingness that permeated in this place.
We decided to make Chinese Lanterns and Cereal bracelets.
Being that Anna and Kai are literally polar opposites I couldn't relate to the attraction they had for eachother at first, but as things progressed it really shows the opposites attract. Also I don't think any person in real life is a nice as Anna is, it's just not natural.. but it is a parnormal book. I enjoyed the effects that both Anna and Kai had on eachother, Anna brings out the good in him and Kai lower Anna's goodness down a bunch of notches. The thing I disliked about Sweet Evil that I totally wasn't expecting was just how mature this book got. I think that this book should not be read by those who are under 16, things get a a bit out of control with all the drinking and sexual stuff that is going on.
photos from my week
Thomas J. Celic, 43, New York, N.Y.
Two hearts beat as one.
Our very own Zooble Run!
How to go against type. Obama campaign latest slogan – Forward – was used as the slogan for European Marxism. I guess that decided Yooo! I guess they didn’t go with Biden’s suggestion which was – Huh?
One of our contacts found us a few things, but they said it has been a pretty hard winter back here so there hasn't been much opportunity to get out and search.
I love food, and after years of getting my coeliac disease under control, I’ve fallen back in love with food.
When – 6 March – 2 April
Looking from our vantage point back to that ear it is very hard to fathom the collective state of mind of Americans before the attack on Pearl Harbor. The horrors of the First World War were still very much alive back then and with the nation still overwhelmed with surviving the Great Depression very few people wanted to get involved with another European war. I guess the world was viewed as a much bigger place with two massive oceans safely separating the North American continent from the bloody carnage going on over there.
There it was. I had a reason to be scared.
This morning I opened my email and waiting for me was a note from a gentleman that sends me all kinds of information about guns, shooting, and self defense. I always look forward to what he has to say and I almost always learn something. Today's email led me to Bayou Renaissance Man's blog. It included a link to this post which if you are even remotely interested in self defense you should read.
For an interesting and detailed refutation of the anti-"Robber Baron" socialist propaganda, I recommend the article Seven Myths about the Great Philanthropists. It's not a self-serving hagiography, but it does bring a lot of information to light that public school progressives excised from the official history we were taught.
We're almost at the end of our Build Your Own Website series ... there is of course plenty of stuff we haven't covered, but what we have will pretty much get you up and running.
Everything has a price; and the cost of Nesy's life may be higher than anyone expected.
Our Canadian friends tell us that virtually all Canadian military bases, especially those north of the 50th Parallel, are all set up with concentration camps. Not even half of these can be listed, but here are a few sites with the massive land space to handle any population:
6. Finally – what are your thoughts on the music scene today?
While we don’t know for sure which of any Russian booty spies got close to a cabinet member, and whether or not either or both individuals had their clothes off in the alleged instance of ” too closeness,” we do know that this sort of thing is possible. As silly as it seems in this age of easily accessible sex, the old “booty spy” technique can be effective.
You're searching too; restless and vulnerable.
Ps: btw, speaking of numbers? The lab assigned the case # of 23-08 to my case. The 23rd of Jan is my birthday and of course the 8th is yours and Jessie’s. Strange, huh?
Incubators are up and running. Hopefully we will have lots of baby chicks in a few weeks. The baby bunnies are growing and getting more adorable everyday. Can't wait till Easter weekend so they can have new homes. Tinker and Bella aren't showing much but sure act like tired pregnant doggies. They have gotten picky on what they will eat now and turn their nose up at food they use to love. Glad they will have their puppies before the heat of the summer.
Our attempt at going out to eat with three kids. This picture is blury, but it completely captures how the whole meal played out. Claire danced across the bench we were all seated at. Kellen played with the light fixture behind us, disrupting a couple trying to enjoy their lunch. Meanwhile, all 6 booths across from us stared at us THE ENTIRE TIME as they watched the circus that was our table. It was unbelievable.
Sometimes we complain about cleaning our house every week, Thank God that we have a house to clean.
For starters my entire blog was wiped out by some freak blogger accident only the web address and my sidebars design survived!
Several of my books would not work as e-books. The Marilyn Monroe Treasures and Celine Dion: For Keeps are the most obvious-- they're gorgeous, oversized gift books filled with beautiful photo layouts and removable memorabilia in vellum envelopes. How am I going to get a removable marriage license into a Kindle? I'm not. And I'm not even going to make many sales on Amazon of books like that-- those are books that people have to see in person to appreciate. They have to walk into a bookstore and notice the gold foil cover and open the pages and feel the textures and be delighted at the beauty of the layouts and the intimate feel of the memorabilia. I love writing those books. A culture dedicated to e-reading will kill those books.
“An Arabic dictionary,” she said, holding it up. This didn’t phase the other official, who continued to spy beneath the the carpeted seats of my Escort.
I call Jae.
Some of you (particularly observant) readers may recall seeing the chair with this fabric before. That's because it was wrapped around the cushions for awhile before I pulled the upholstery trigger. Since it's a bold choice, I wanted to live with it for awhile.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C). Grease a 9x9 inch pan. Sift together flour, baking powder, salt, and 1/4 teaspoon of cinnamon; set aside.
So, I taught a friend to homebrew this past saturday. Actually, I think that I taught making beer is easy and full of comedic errors. Man, I screwed up so many parts of the process, it was horrible. First, my barley crusher stopped grinding grain. After a little internet research I think I can fix it but still, that isn't a good demonstration for the new learner. I was suppossed to have about half pound more roasted malt in the grist, but I threw it out because the damn mill wouldn't grind it.
Year of Release: 1966
cradling and being cradled
The theme for May is COMMITMENT.
Elon is 4-1 entering Saturday’s game, with wins over Davidson, Presbyterian, Georgia Southern, and Furman, and a loss to Wake Forest.
1/2 cup brown sugar (some of us like it a little sweeter, so you could go 3/4 cup)
Yet their video and digitally printed protest banner shows that they do embrace electronic processes. They use them but refute their tyranny. Their large wall pieces marry digital printing processes with the handcrafted to create tactile, fragile surfaces made from glued layers of newspapers, overprinted and painted.
Here are a few more pics... just in case you didn't see enough... ha! ;)
Hebrews 10: 22 says: (let us draw near to God with a sincere heart and with the full assurance that faith brings, having our hearts sprinkled to cleanse us from a guilty conscience and having our bodies washed with pure water). Let us all draw near our God in faith. He will cleanse us and wash us with the pure water of His grace. We just need to follow the posted instructions and place ourselves in neutral.
Apple already has their Apple TV “hobby” on the market, which will be upgraded this year.
Beware of His Highness, because of the bull.
1 racks
Perhaps I should expand that point: It may be asked whether the contention that realism -- particularly about human nature -- is basic to conservatism is consistent with my contention here to the effect that respect for the individual and a love of personal liberty is basic to conservatism. Which of the two really is basic -- realism or love of liberty? The simple answer is of course that the two are intimately related. If you are realistic about the evil that people individually and people collectively (i.e. governments) often do to one-another, you will want the individual to be as free from outside attentions as possible. Putting it another way, liberty is what conservatives advocate and realism is why they advocate it.
I will weep tears of joy if he's emerging from a grandfather clock onto the sands of Dieppe.
- some evidence that the man most commonly associated with this phenomenon could be using exactly these techniques to do just this,
This is the one I struggled with so decided that a personal trend of mine is to take photographs of our local beach at different times of the year....so I went for a walk this morning. A beautiful bright blue sparkly day, cold wind - on the cusp of spring...
I have the freedom of mainly working from home, juggling several clients. With a lack of face-to-face meetings, I think it was easy to get into long-term email conversations. But our in-boxes have been overloaded. People cover-their-asses by copying everyone on group emails, then replying to everyone, and so on and so on, exacerbating the email glut.
Also, I'm a huge fan of beer. I drink it as often as I can. And more than I should. But that's not the point. Beer and art go together like intelligence and people from the South. In theory, it's entirely possible, but in practice, it's really awkward to see and you KNOW something is out of place. Plus, you're in a crowd walking. I'm going to “accidentally” bump into you and see if I can ruin your day, you pseudo intellectual pretentious alcoholic.
Mostly, I am grateful for washing machines and hot showers. And oh, how grateful I am for Clorox wipes.
Talented Jennifer McGuire made a card set called "His and Her" card set. A masculine and feminine card using the same supplies. I love this genius idea and want to give it a try. I happen to need some birthday cards for kids. Well, mine is kind of "cheating" I think since they are for boys and girls.
So far Touch has been entertaining, albeit being deeply flawed. The connections are sometime tenuous at best. The wallowing in 9/11 sorrow makes for one of the least compelling big story arcs I’ve ever seen in the show. Usually the procedural stuff is filler to get to the big picture story, a la X-Files. However, this show is quite the opposite. That being said, the show is doing something different than I’ve seen on TV, and for the most part executing that unique vision. I’ll have a lot more to say on this when the season wraps up.
Brennan is finishing the last weeks of 5th Grade. He loves school and stays busy with all of his sports and activities. This year Brennan was in wrestling again. He was a sectional qualifier and medaled at sectionals in March. At school, he played baseball, basketball, and track. He was also on scholar bowl and has been on the honor roll all year. He has started summer baseball and doing well. Brennan is a great guy and we are so proud of him!
Oh, clap your hands, all you peoples!
Needless to say I was not impressed with the hall of fame. I could have sat and watched people going in all day, so now I have 3 hours to do something else. The Zoo.
Friend you haven’t seen in 10 years who likes to judge you says to himself, “Oh, strange friend is blogging. The blog is good, but it’s making zero dollars. My strange friend has invoked GB0$, which means they blog, but leave it the feck alone. This blogger does not want to talk about it. The blog could lead to something, it also could not. Regardless, he/ she wants me to stop judging.”
The council could use the current surplus as a temporary measure in order to avoid the cuts for now. This would make the council extremely popular amongst the workers and the community in general. (A far cry from the harsh reality of the feelings towards the council at the moment) The council could then use this popularity to build a mass campaign throughout the county to defend the council against any attack from the Assembly or Westminster and to demand the money necessary for all the jobs and services needed within the area.
There are a wide variety of reactions that may manifest during a healing crisis.
Very Retro Chic! Kravitz has an album due this August titled Black and White America… wonder if those are his favorite colours?
It took a long time for me to figure out exactly how to do it and what I wanted to write. I loved Neil Gaiman's AMERICAN GODS, Cory Doctorow's DOWN AND OUT IN THE MAGIC KINGDOM, and China Mieville's THE SCAR, and I tried to write stuff like that, but it just wasn't quite working. It wasn't quite right. Then I read in rapid succession Holly Black's VALIANT, Pete Hautman's GODLESS, and Gabrielle Zevine's ELSEWHERE and I realized I wanted to write YA.
1 ice block
I’m about to forgive you
Quick stop at the grocery store
“Even after Jesus’ resurrection and ascension to heaven, he had to wait at his Father’s right hand until the time came for him to rule as King over mankind. (Hebrews 10:12, 13)” —The Watchtower, 6/15/94, pg 6
When the Bill Cosby Show first hit TV, it was highly criticized because the sitcom black father was a doctor and his family lived in a nice home. I heard the same criticism of Diahann Carroll in her TV sitcom, Julia, in which she played a successful black nurse -- not reflective of the black experience. The Cosby Show and Julia were outside the Democrat-promoted "black box."
Will Middlebrooks- 2-3, 2B, 1 BB, 1 SB
In the movie Schindler’s List, at the time when he and his wife were fleeing the Allies at the end of the war, the Jews he had saved (in what I can only assume was a dramatized event) presented him with a ring which said in Hebrew “he who saves one life saves the world entire.” The quote is Talmudic.
Isn't it just WOW? =P
So, Pinterest. Just a couple of thoughts.
Dogfish Head is a wonderful brewery in Delaware that is most well known for its IPA, most notably the 60 Minute version which is easily found and the 90 Minute, which is supposed to be a hoppier IPA than the 60 Minute (probably because the number of minutes in the beer is how long one of them will fuck you up) but actually doesn't taste like that.
Later, Hosea was called upon to tell the Israelites that because of their rebellion against the Lord, they would be carried away into captivity by a foreign power. “Tumult shall arise among your people, and all your fortresses shall be plundered” (10:14).
And here's her husband/co-restaurant owner Adam, looking wide-eyed as he noticed how very packed the place was. Every seat was full, and people were having to stand to eat! I'm so impressed that a vegan cafe can draw such a crowd in Memphis:
Daniel has a hard time keeping things from me so he was acting really weird
Morgan!
I’m going to stay awake tonite till I hear from you. Hope you had a nice Christmas & that you are doing well ..
We also should not write off Harry Hughes and Chris Drake as "dupes". It is human nature to first go into denial when one learns of a close friend or relative committing such an act. Hughes and Drake knew and worked with Ready, and this was a side he never displayed to them. They need sufficient time to digest and process the information before they can come to terms with it emotionally. Harry Hughes and Chris Drake should still be considered solid comrades unless or until they prove otherwise.
a) If you want the general public (ie. the LCD/retards) to understand your important safety message, don't use a word that one could use to win scrabble.
There are other signs, as well. Calculated Risk reports the Federal Reserve Bank of Philadelphia has released the coincident indexes for the 50 states for March 2012. In the past month, the indexes increased in 48 states, decreased in one state (Rhode Island), and remained stable in one state (South Dakota), for a one-month diffusion index of 94.
What are some tasks that others think of as work, but which you enjoy? What are some activities others enjoy but which you identify as work?
It's Coco. Her brother has finally learned how to behave himself (mostly) in a restaurant and now she's the one being a pill. She yells. She yells whenever she feels like yelling, which, unfortunately, is often. If we lean over and sshhhh her, pat her gently, try to calm her feisty self down, she turns and waves her little arms at us while yelling something unintelligible. We think she's casting spells.
A few last comments
2. Prometheus (June 8) – While many continue to speculate if the film is a prequel, reboot, spinoff, or sequel to Alien, all I know is that Ridley Scott is returning to the genre that made him famous (Alien, Blade Runner) and that alone is enough to get me super excited for Prometheus. With a cast that includes Noomi Rapace (the original Girl With The Dragon Tattoo who seems to be taking on the Ripley role), Michael Fassbender, and Charlize Theron (two times the Theron this summer!), and trailers that have slowly rolled out the plot in spectacular fashion, Prometheus is shaping up to be the Inception of the summer, a (mostly) original piece of entertainment that’s part thrilling, part horrifying, and all out entertaining. Bring it on!
Last week, I was uber-surprised that a) the county library system had the new book I was looking for, and b) that there was no wait list.
So much for camping.
2 red bell peppers
From across the room,
A long room with white walls, something like a waiting room filled the canvas of my mind. I am surrounded by what I call my ‘legal family’ I say this for the lack of a better word. Something isn’t right and I am thrown out on the street wrapped just in a white cloth, maybe a saree. My right foot hurts (it actually did) and there are scratched on the arms. A boy with a kettle full of hot tea and some glasses tries to help and asks for the cloth claiming it to be his. I plead him to let it be with me as it is the only thing I have to cover my body.
* Window cleaner recipe:
2. Meanwhile, add the water, cumin, chili powder, salt and pepper to the eggs and lightly beat to combine.
This weekend, at least on million, and most probably closer to two million, unhappy American taxpayers descended upon Washington to protest against various of the Obama administrations ill conceived and worse thought through policies. This was probably the largest of such demonstrations Washington has ever seen, exceeding the much hyped Million Man March and the Promise Keepers Rally. The numbers involved were not only filmed and reported on right wing blogs, but also in the UK Daily Mail, who presumably either didn't get the memo, or were too busy lying about the BNP or the Muslim riots, to realise they were also supposed to be lying about America.
Deep in the gloom of a fireless cave,
Hello every-one, hope you are all having a relaxing Sunday afternoon. I sure am Lol.
If you then, who are wicked,
2. In a 9x13 glass baking dish layer noodles, white sauce with chicken, then cheese. Repeat steps, ending with mozzarella cheese on top. Bake at 350 degrees for 35-45 minutes.
Well apart from those Karmic conditions that may be set as ‘set ups’ for you to learn from right now, the rest is in fact changeable by you. No! I didn’t read this in a book but yes I have achieved the seeming impossible of changing my past to enhance my life Now. And if I can do it anyone can do it !
The brutal reappearance of the deadly necklace in recent weeks is something I shall reluctantly focus upon later.
You thought love would be a weight. Something that would fill you up inside, bleeding into every empty space, filling in the cracks life had made as it broke off pieces of you every day. Love would be a kind of security blanket for the soul, you thought. That was before. Before you met him, before he held you, before you fell asleep with the bony heat of his knee pressed into your thigh. Love wasn’t heavy at all. Love made you light, a balloon floating above the streets, but always tethered by his hand, holding tight to the string.
During his youth Bukowski was shy and socially withdrawn, a condition exacerbated during his teens by an extreme case of acne. Neighborhood children ridiculed his German accent. In his early teens Henry had an epiphany when he was introduced to alcohol by his friend William ‘Baldy’ Mullinax. ‘This is going to help me for a very long time,’ he later wrote, describing the genesis of his chronic alcoholism; or, as he saw it, the genesis of a method he could utilize to come to more amicable terms with his own life.
Photographer
and, more importantly, for me. ;)
This is as much about change as anything, and realization that things that were great can eventually die. Who knows what the future holds for the company, but it means change for Rochester - and not simply the 7,000 local employees. I lived in Rochester for 15 years. So despite the fact that it's almost a thousand miles away - I feel it.
-We use disposable wipes still (I'm still not ready to try reusable wipes). We have not had to purchase any yet due to all the gifts at showers!
When I'm nearing the edge of the woods and when I've had a fill of this bloody fun!
CLIMATIS CHURCH CARD
College is a playground. It’s a place to make friends. It’s a place to use your imagination. Most importantly, it’s a place to make mistakes. Getting bumps and bruises on the playground is inevitable, but you quickly learn how to recover. Is it the same for college relationships? Heartache after heartache, you learn how to recover quickly. Brush it off and continue to play-get played. Mistakes are mutual. Maybe it’s a crush in class, a cute passerby on campus, a random hottie at a party, or even a high school sweetheart you brought to college. As simple as those categories seem, none of them are considered easy. Every situation is tempting but no situation is promising.
These last few months life happened.
craft kit
As always with Tove Jansson's Moomin books, the dark and fearful possibilities of such a scenario are delivered in a text bubbling with optimism and charm. And so, as Moominpappa recounts his mis-spent youth through his long awaited volume of memoirs, we are taken on a dazzling adventure of surreal and bizarre experiences.
Christmas is all about One special Child. I’d like to tell you about another child—actually 1 million of them. That’s the number of children who are sold into sex trafficking every year. Some of them are just 4 years old. They’re in your city and mine.
Anyway what has impressed me the most since I have stopped using conditioner is my hair actually isn’t as dry as it used to be and also I don’t need to wash it as often. It definitely holds volume better and I’m brushing my hair much more carefully as I don’t want to damage it by pulling out the knots so overall there is less breakage. For fear of causing any long-term damage, I’m currently using Kerastase Nutritive Batin Satin shampoo, which seems to help with the knots and smells divine.
Smile :-)
Frosted Cupcakes
About 6 months into it we decided to get our adoption license. We took another round of classes and more paperwork, and were approved. We were currently fostering a little boy I will call G. He was 1 when we got him. He had blond curls and blue eyes. We all quickly fell head over heals for him. We were working on the adoption process for him, even though he still had a grandmother who was also pursing custody. There were circumstances with her that had us all convinced no judge in their right mind would give G to her. Well that’s exactly what happened. 3 months after his 2nd birthday he was given to his grandmother. I was devastated. I knew I would never see him again. It was as if he had died. All the other foster children, we knew we weren’t keeping. It was hard for some to leave, but it never hurt like this.
Emeralds, Does It Look Like I’m Here?If it would’ve been four songs like “Genetic” it would’ve been my Album of the Year. Otherwise, I like that they are taking chances even if it doesn’t fit my taste all the time.
Quality Leaders Are Prepared In The Wilderness
2. When they cool down rub the nuts between your palms to loosen out the skin .
5 visible
Professor X is Charles Francis Xavier (XMen) He is a mutant. His mutant power is telepathy. His power is so strong he can control the minds of others. I’m loving this Super Power and again feel that all girls should have this ability. How many of us have tried to read a guys mind to know what they’re thinking? I still am useless at trying to decipher their thoughts. This power would be ideal in putting an end to his mind games, ‘cus lets face it guys excel in these.
Designing a baby nursery can be so much fun. However, for parents who are keeping the baby's sex a surprise or want to reuse the room for future siblings, planning a gender neutral nursery can sometimes be a design challenge. A good starting place when creating a unisex nursery is to select a soothing color palette. Browsing crib bedding, artwork or taking cues from nature may help get your creative juices flowing.
Growing up in a diverse community such as Berrien Springs—my home village—simplifies the overcomplicated view the majority of American society has in regards to race. A friend of mine once remarked that he never even understood that his best friend was black until someone explained it to him in sixth grade.
A point that came up time and time again whilst chatting to Judy was the importance of networking. Our own design and the market module puts a great emphasis on creating a professional online presence for yourself, to raise your profile and create useful connections. Judy would see other designers updating blogs or making connections via twitter and think why am I not doing that? If you are not promoting yourself online there is a whole world of business you are missing out on. Judy maintains a blog, along with Twitter and LinkedIn accounts to connect with her market. She describes social media applications as a direct link of communication with customers, investors and anyone else of interest, giving them a much better insight into her working life and creating a personal connection. Social networking has also helped her reach out to a global marketplace that would not have been available to her otherwise.
The second I saw the two of them sitting in the stools... Kurt wearing a suit that shimmers, and Rachel in her sailor shirt, it reminded me of something I'd seen before. Maybe you've never seen the original, and in that case totally missed the reference to the amazing Judy Garland, and living legend herself, Barbra Streisand. Here is their classic performance of the same song, from the Judy Garland Show circa 1963. Notice the similarities?
Thank you for being here and I would love to hear from you;
Until this year.
Exif Data: Nikon D5000 ; lens: Tamron AF 55-200; 90 mm, ISO 720; f/4,2 ; 1/250 sec.
Max Studio silk blouse, Marshalls, $12
I do not mean to sound shallow but when considering changing your gender feeling attractive is something one literally has to grab at, occasionally, fleetingly. I need to not feel like a freak but sitting here in this house, my Victorian dream full of period features, I feel like a freak; at least a freak of nature. Born fundamentally wrong, wishing only for a very simple life where I would meet a man, fall in love, cook lovely food, make a home, get pregnant and be an ‘ok’ mum. Instead here I am at forty-six changing my name, growing my hair, growing breasts, quite frankly going through a form of puberty no one should go through beyond the age of sixteen. Thirty years too late, as usual I am doing it too late. I tried very badly to make clothes out of muslin way beyond John Galliano’s rich forays.
34. Pound Puppies
Just another day in customer services.
This is my gorgeous cat Jasper... who has a fettish for sponge daubers! Seriously - this cat is so clever - he can figure out where I've put them and then opens the draw with his paw (those little openings in the drawers are the perfect cat-paw size... thanks Kaisercraft!).
I made two dips: Toffee Crunch Dip, and a Chocolate Chip Cheeseball (tasted like frosting with mini chocolate chips in it)
Complications are rare but can include meningitis and encephalitis.
“Dr. P is out of network for all insurance.”
CREWEL EMBROIDERY
A minute of so after mile 7 I decided to turn to the bottle in my fuel belt filled with flat redbull(I can’t stand the texture of gels)! My line was thinking was that the burst of energy could propel me to mile 10, and then it would be all guts from there! Once it kicked in, it worked! From mile 7-9 I really picked up the pace; it also helped that this part of the route went through part of the Fayetteville trail system, which took the wind of the equation for a little while.
Roll forward to this week.
The Soumano brothers developed their sound by blending Takamba inspired riffs from northern Mali with their own take on southwestern Mali’s Wassoulou. The genre defying result was heavy on gain, soaked in reverb, and channeled the psychedelic frenzy of 1970s Nigeria. It was the perfect soundtrack to the ne’er-do-well lifestyle of Le Fida’s early morning patrons, who were younger and a little more excitable then their counterparts at Club Djembe.
They are so warm and comfy, comfy, comfy!!
Cast on 21 sts,
Anyway, I thought it would be appropriate to write a post about something that many people my age (myself included) are currently having to undergo: living at home. Moving back in with the parents after being away at college for several years is a bit acculturating. Instead of calling your folks once a week to tell them that you are still alive, constant contact is unavoidable. You may no longer live by "your rules" and thus are reverted back to your teenage years instead of making the customary transition to mature adult. Per usual, I have highlighted a couple themes that make living at home after college a bit of a drag.
Artichoke, papaya and chorizo salad served with a parsley lemon dressing.
There are literally thousands of coaches out there…with their own slant or insight… on what is the correct way of doing things…
because you're comparing your behind-the-scenes
The following day we went back out to see about reclaiming the three-wheeler, and when I saw the bed that broke Jim’s fall, it looked like a nest built just for him! It was clear that not only had angels held his body up, but they had guided him to this safe place, this “cleft in the rock.” We all thanked the Lord for saving and protecting Jim, but I questioned God as to why He hadn’t prompted me to pray when he was in such a dangerous situation. The Spirit said, “I did, and you did.” The dream of Jim being hurt and lost on the side of a cliff instantly came to mind and I realized that the Lord had prepared and provided for Jim’s protection way ahead of time!
Pam worked on another piece of Susan Fellers that I did not get a picture of, but we also spent a lot of time working on this design of a rug for her chef son and doing some color planning. Can't wait to see how it comes out.
Once you're out of the little pod and into the fresh air (and on terra ferma again), the views are breathtaking and worth every penny of the fare to take the trip. Click any of the photos for a larger/better view. The photo above is looking out over the town of Banff (bottom left corner). The small rocky bump in the middle of the valley is Tunnel Mountain with the Bow River to it's right.
I applaud Kate Winslet for taking on this role...she outdid herself! Not many can fill the
When there are ripples of discontent or rumblings of doubt, God reminds me that He responds to my questions with an answer always as full and lush as Spring.
Any film that tries to continue a story originated by Alfred Hitchcock is asking for it. They knew that even with the Psychos discussed earlier. But The Birds? What the hell? And with more blood and gore? And actors less expressive than Rod Taylor? And stupidest of all there's a music score; isn't that, you know, counterproductive to everything Hitch built up carefully for us in 1963? And you thought Psycho IV was bad....
2. Most retailers were not stocking Hot Wheels (priced at Rs. 25 each) as they preferred to stock high priced toys having more margins
It takes strict parental dissipline and clever psychology to keep a child happy, while at the same time convincing the child that education is an essential ingredient of life. I can recall how much I hated taking German between grades 8 and 10 at high school. I can also remember how half the pupils in my class (overcrowded with 42 pupils - BTW) hated taking the compulsory language subject of Afrikaans.
5. Favorite drink? water, grape juice, tea, milk and bubble tea. mojito, gin n tonic, asti and red wine are my favorite alcoholic drinks.
or double up and drive the car, like ben and jack.
This brings me to my point. As parents we have to be aware and involved in what goes on in the classroom. Just because they are at school doesn't mean they are getting the same values taught to them. This reinforces my opinion we must be open with our kids so they will talk to us.
I refuse to live my life in anger at your early death,
Borne through the smoke of the battles and pierc’d with missiles I
and so, our last few days of april were spent recouping, redecorating, and getting back to work.
Jesus had said, “I did not come to bring peace, but a sword. For I came to set a man against his father, and a daughter against her mother, and a daughter-in-law against her mother-in-law; and a man’s enemies will be the members of his household.”
serenaded in blue
Since I have ascertained there are still people who stop by these parts, I can't resist sharing these stories. I feel like you guys would appreciate them. They shouldn't go to waste.
Of good intentions
Sometimes words mean different things for different cultures or regions. Last week while Sam was watching
I've been a busy busy girl, working on getting listing up in the shop, getting orders out in the mail each day, and well just being mommy! The listing are going up slower than planned because the boys have needed some extra cuddle time, but the rest should be up by the end of the weekend.
My head is really awhirl at the moment - I forgot to mention the very thing that prompted me to open you yesterday!
Necklace: Undefined Lilies – Mad Hatter – Red/Gold
When this photo was first shown to us earthlings, according to Degrasse Tyson, many people took it as proof of life on the red planet. Really, those are just rocks. The photos that scientists used to locate water on Mars show a barren landscape (no "faces"). His point is this - if you go looking for life on a distant planet and think that it's going to look like you, you're not going to find it.
drag
so you are in that distant place
Sathit also said the authorities would target the Voice of Thaksin magazine.
Jump Rope
Siegel M, Fuerst HT. Low birth weight and maternal virus diseases. A prospective study of rubella, measles, mumps, chicken pox and hepatitis. J Am Med Assoc 1966; 197: 680-684.
To their credit, the authors do more than list the accomplishments and visions of robotics pioneers, clean water innovators, and genomic entrepreneurs. The real power of these advances, they convincingly argue, is their exponential power and the possibility of them in combination. It’s not that artificial intelligence or robots or cloud computing will save us – it’s the possibility that artificial intelligence plus robots plus cloud computing will fundamentally shift access to basic health care. This, in turn, will improve the economic and educational potential of the very poor, who will harness their own creativity and collective power. This is what will save us.
One day, while they were walking past the hospital swimming pool,
Rally on the North Lawn at the Belvedere. Rally for Women’s Rights, HealthCare, and Equality. There will be Speakers, Music, and protesting! Come Join Us!
She became mine for $41. Seriously, it's almost the exact same necklace.
I wonder about pep talks like this one, however. I have given myself innumerable pep talks throughout my life and none of them have done any good. I think the best thing is to focus outside of yourself. Focus on the customer or the coworker or boss and make their interaction with you as pleasant, empowering and focused as you can. That is the secret of social success and customer service success. Do not focus on yourself, it is deadly. Focus on the other person, and allow yourself to disappear in the act of service. It is hard to describe but I have done it. So I know it can be done, even if it can’t be described very well. So wish me luck because I start my new job in earnest next week. That is when I will need to start demonstrating that I can be an asset to the team. I have been going through some changes and my old neuroses feel comfortable in the face of the unknown future. But I intend to embrace that future wholeheartedly with the same courage and determination I brought to my surgery. Maybe I could consider this social surgery, a removal of social cataracts which hold me back and prevent me from seeing situations clearly. Oddly, I am both an introvert and extrovert, which confuses people sometimes. I can be very friendly and outgoing with them and then the next time I might be withdrawn and seemingly aloof. I am at odds with myself. But I am confident I will get it together, because I am determined to impress my coworkers and my boss with my teamwork. I really want this job to become permanent in October, and I am very clear on how that can happen.
West vs. East (As Jim Morrison said, “The West is the best,” but as Levenberg always says “The East is the Beast.”
This marzan style beer is close to the top of the field when it comes to the Oktoberfest brews. Maybe I am a bit biased, but Great Lakes brews almost all of their beers exceptionally well, and this one gave me the same impression.
¨ Marilyn Brant
-More critical stories
Traditional cultured buttermilk: Cultured buttermilk may be simply cultured milk. As such, it can be whole milk, part-skim, or skim milk. The texture thickens, much as yogurt’s texture thickens, as the bacteria create an acidic environment, curdling the proteins. Truly traditional buttermilk would be made with raw milk, but pastuerized milk can be used with a starter. Cultured buttermilk does contain probiotics, although the specific cultures vary regionally.
This is when you can go off and do whatever you want! I think I spent most of the time watching to see if it would snow so I could take my washing in from the line. (It's Scotland - our weather is odd!)
5. For the Ricotta Frosting: Drain the ricotta cheese by placing in cheese cloth set inside a mesh sieve over a bowl for about an hour or until it seems like all the excess liquid has drained out. Place the drained ricotta in a large mixing bowl and blend in the confectioners sugar. In another bowl beat the heavy cream on high speed to stiff peaks. Fold the whipped cream into the ricotta until fully incorporated.
Isaiah
...because you're terrified that you're never going to meet anyone better than him or even more so, you're scared you're not going to meet anyone exactly like him because him, being who he is, is what you want regardless of the circumstances.
Then I found a way to get in through the back door to post this post but as soon as you hit preview that's it there is no way to go back and actually post that post your locked into that preview page.
MAGGIE RODRIGUEZ: How much responsibility does the doctor have in this?
Actually I'm pretty much at a loss to imagine the type of person who might shop there. Would you?
Now, I am looking forward to a New Year's Eve with friends including the girls from the blog who haven't been all together in one place since this time last year. I know we will have lots to talk about. Although 2009 was a pretty good year, I am anxious to continue making more progress on what I started. Sue, you and I can work on continuing to change our lifestyles together. My goals include incorporating ways to plan and shop for our meals, so that we do more of our own cooking during the work week. I know you could probably help me with this. And perhaps, I could help you with putting a routine together that includes some techniques for strength training as well as cardio? One step at a time of course! We can talk more about it tomorrow night:)
T: kinda young, huh?
As for the fourth generation, he’s not yet two and will sadly grow up with no memory of Great Grandma. My son brought him to see Mum two days before she died. The baby put his hand out to Mum. Mum put her hand out to the baby and they stayed like that for several long minutes. He may never remember it but I will never forget.
And miles to go before I sleep.
She was funny and kind and it’s hard to accept
I did wash my hands, btw.
Okay anyway, my point is not to talk about why I left so I've sidetracked too much. My point is, he told me he got into SQ and I told him he has just ruined every single last bit of chance he had with me. I could not trust him not to betray me again. (He said he will not and that he will only want to be with me.) SQ? Every single crew will get their own hotel room, hello? Who are we kidding that nothing will happen should he get closer to some girl he feels something for and she feels the same? Self-discipline? Maybe, maybe. But I wouldn't count on it.
Anyway, we're almost done with her room, which is great since I'm officially "full term" this week. Since this is my first time diving into pink and all things girly, I wanted to share. I don't have a fancy dancy camera, so these pictures are so-so. (Note to self: put digital SLR on list of "needs" for baby)
Of course, the counter tops were like the aftermath of some horrible knife accident. Loved it! If you are a spooky little kitchen witch, there is nothing more fun than cutting up beets and watching the blood-like juice. It tickles me silly every time.
The above schedule does not even include the emotional/psychological component to raising children, such as the 50 minute conversation my stepdaughter laid on me within 1 hour of being in our home, because she “really, really needed to talk to someone” about what is happening in her Mom’s home.
I didn’t make green beans. I had a bag of arugula in the fridge and served that with salt, pepper, and some white balsamic vinegar.
A massive overflow chamber with two floors of concrete and a rapid river of poop.
Things that make me go ughhhh.
This video is WOW.
While a unifying perspective of some sort is often helpful in promoting identifications of various sorts, and for unifying the filmic experience, it is important to keep in mind that these functions do not need to necessarily be anchored to a character that resembles a person in the so-called ‘real world’. Why does our protagonist always need to wear the same face? Be played by the same actor? Have the same voice? Use the same name? Live in the same house? Work at the same job? Have the same set of memories, or the same set of character traits or dispositions for dealing with the world?
I added some family heirloom pieces from our grandparents to the glass front antique cabinet.
Since it is such an odd hat I took a picture of the side view before the final side brim was added so you can get an inside view of how this whole thing goes together.
Tony’s trusted friend and business partner betrays him, having designed his own Iron Man suit, but having been unable to make it work without the “heart piece.” So far so good. So, he paralyses Tony and steal’s his heart piece, to power his own suit, leaving Tony to die.
Christmas didn’t turn out too bad after all despite Mother inviting Uncle Dudley, who, at this time of year, gets pissed every day from the night of Children In Need onward till he’s stone broke a few days after New Year’s and he can drink no more. I would suppose that he is drunk more so between this period as it is fair to say he is drunk generally most the year round.
I did it! I blogged something every day during the month of October for Down syndrome awareness! I feel pretty good about it; I feel like I touched on some topics that are important to me and my family, and I painted an honest picture of what it’s like to have a child with Down syndrome, at least for this mother and this family.
He folded up a cloth as a pillow and invited me to lay down.
Church and my Savior, Jesus Christ.
You can follow Simon on his facebook page:
Again, these are the results we strive for and want at the end of it all. Complete happiness, bliss and joy and a fabulous launch into the road of being Mr. & Mrs. Everitt!
Well it is my paper buddy Dot's Birthday today... HB Dottie!! Special wishes for an especially special day... I hope it is filled with all that you love!!
to ask for both of us, even if
The land is in pools, mirrors. As if there were a flood and only islands remain, islands with the trees from my earliest memories–the wild apple blossoms, their pink and white petals falling like snow. I imagine him under there, in the shade of the silky blossoms, leaning back on an arm, picking blades of grass, his long legs muzzled in by the sweet alysum growing. His blue eyes look up through their long, long black eyelashes–the lashes I’ve inherited–and into the blossoms, into the purple sky. His reflection is still on the water. Peace. He’s found peace. He still wears the cream colored shirt with the brown vees from the shoulders to the chest, heavy in his strange scent that I can still smell if I remember really hard.
Ian Fleming saw Chitty Chitty Bang Bang race when he was a young boy – and that memory came back to him when - convalescing from a heart attack - it formed the inspiration behind his only children’s book.
And that's when he suggested playing kiss chase. I thought for a moment that Laurel could in actual fact be Rubbish, but then remembered that Rubbish only drinks apple juice. From miniature kiddie cartons I suspect.
11/20/11 Sunday
Oh, by the way, I've already bought Chasing Vermeer. It'll be my next read.
Laurie then reads an account fron a former user of her site who is now a moderator and friend – she was diagnosed and put on PAXIL at 3 months pregnant and after being born her child went through withdrawal .
From: McGuire, Lisa E.
when I reel out the roll-call of the indebted. These include Tori
When you are ready to bake, line a baking tray with parchment paper or foil paper and put the powdered sugar in a plate large enough to roll the cookie balls.
Hon. Julian Houston was born and educated in Richmond, Virginia before attending the Hotchkiss School in Lakeville, Connecticut. He is a graduate of Boston University and the Boston University School of Law, and was a community organizer in Harlem during the civil rights movement. He is an associate justice of the Superior Court of Massachusetts (ret.), appointed in 1990. He had previously served for eleven years as a Justice of the Roxbury District Court. He is chair of the Executive Committee of the Long Road to Justice exhibit, a program of the Justice George L. Ruffin Society, which he formed with six other senior, minority criminal justice professionals in 1984. He spearheaded Roxbury Youthworks, Inc., which provides services to young people, and the Roxbury District Court Child-Care Center. He is the author of “New Boy” (Houghton-Mifflin), a coming-of-age novel set in the Civil Rights era.
The three-day summit, now in its third year, is organized by Tina Brown, editor in chief of Newsweek and The Daily Beast. Besides Streep and Clinton, feminist icon Gloria Steinem and former secretary of state Madeleine Albright, Brown harnessed the star power of Angelina Jolie, who came to read the words of Dr. Hawa Abdi, a Somali humanitarian facing danger from Islamist rebels there.
Torrey Pines Beach:
Creams or ointments containing cortisone may help control itching from insect bites, contact dermatitis, or eczema. Cortisone cream should not be applied to the face unless a doctor prescribes it, and should not be used over the body for prolonged periods without a doctor’s approval.
*Truck Trend Magazine
That’s the question I was asking myself this weekend as the final game of the FIFA Women’s World Cup came to an end. With Team USA a contender from the opening of the tournament, America was watching. ESPN showed our matches, and Americans across the country watched. And as Team USA advanced to the semifinals and then to the final game, living rooms and sports bars were packed to watch Team USA go for the FIFA Championship!
“This is me, going home.”
I suspect that the leading Family Law bloggers may be rather surprised at this.
Now...onto the Winna's
Bboy / Poppin / Hip Hop / Funkstyle (Waackin, Lockin, Toprockin only) / Kids Freestyle
BLITZER: We’re going to leave this subject, but before we do, I want Speaker Gingrich to clarify what you said yesterday in that major speech you delivered on space. You said that you would support a lunar colony or a lunar base, and that if 13,000 Americans were living there, they would be able to apply for U.S. statehood from the moon.
If you have a small forehead equally small cheekbones and a broad jaw, you have what we call a triangular face. More likely than not, it has some angular characteristics. In this case we would suggest taking a rounder frame to offset the angles a bit, such as a semi rimless frame that emphasizes the upper face,
Edna Buchanan, aka "The Queen of Crime," is another local author who writes mysteries that take place in South Florida, so I'm adding her to my list.
A report to the council’s planning committee, which highlighted Willingham residents’ concerns, said the number of caravans authorised or tolerated had risen from 394 last July to 437.
But he is unsure of the reality of the past. Pinter's characters often look back in that way, not in anger but in disillusionment. In a sense of being dislocated from a past where they once felt comfortable.
I’ll probably use it to add delays between the startup game states (startup logo to main menu to first level) since it’s pretty useless for anything in the main game loop. Even if I don’t use it, I learned something along the way.
such surface lacks the pressure;
I stamp set I used is from There She Goes (can't remember what it is called right now, sorry!), and it was really easy to use and was glad that it was see through so one could re-align up the stamp again in case only part of the image showed up. Once we all stamped our images onto the shells, we painted the images in using SU Watercolor crayons or Tombow markers with a watercolor brush and with either one of these methods you have to make sure you don't have too much water on your brush or things will run/bleed. This is even more the case with having the shell as your medium, the grooves in the shell provided great little ramps for your paint to run down! Once we all colored in the images, let them dry, we sprayed them with a protective coating so they wouldn't run or bleed if they got wet again... and some of us even sprayed on some shimmer to make it sparkle a bit.
1 TBS ginger,
At home with my brothers,
In movies they have him walking from the grave up the sharp stone steps that led down into it,…but that is in no way accurate as to the description in the story of the new testament,…read on…
PEDILID BEETLE (above left)
Please indicate how the underlying reasons for the genocide can be resolved.
Ink: real red, old olive, certainly celery, chocolate chip (SU), Memento tuxedo black (Tsukineko), Copic markers
Slaves brought to these shores beginning in the 1600s were treated as property, and portrayed as children who needed to be taken care of — lazy, promiscuous, intellectually inferior, unattractive, deceptive, and dangerous. They worked from dawn to dusk while the threat of the whip hovered over them. The break up and sale of families occurred regularly. Nothing good came from a racist system that denied its victims autonomy, the essence of what it means to be a human being.
3. The book was released thirteen years ago, and it shows. There’s an article which mentions tuna fish costing fifty cents a can. Recently tuna fish went on sale at Zellers, for a dollar.
I believe the Lord has been teaching me recently about how I view and treat those in my own family. If someone does not do something up to the standard I would wish, I sometimes get upset with them. I think I am trying to confront them in a biblical way, pointing out their faults in love, but that is not really the case. In reality, I think I was really just trying to convict them of what I thought were sins in their lives (and they may have been). But, I was not pointing anything out with biblical love. I was irritated with them, and was just trying to get them to change into how I wanted them.
Heed the Christmas wish that regrets the past, forgetting your gift of Now but love life lest you sacrifice it.
Why? Because I felt angry. Angry that I was so unprepared for a miscarriage because I had no idea how common they are.
10) I am a Sagittarius with Taurus rising.
So what is in store for you on this hot and humid Humpday?
The ceremony for the peace award will take place on 10 December in Oslo, Norway’s capital. Meanwhile you can email your thoughts (express yourself freely) to the committee at postmaster@nobel.no
fascinating plump-braceleted wrists
SNOW!
Fall in contribution of agriculture to the overall Gross Domestic Product (GDP), which has gone down to 13.9 per cent. It notes that this trend is expected in the development process of any economy. Yet, agriculture forms the backbone of development, as 52 per cent of India’s work force is still engaged in agriculture for its livelihood and is important for food security and inclusive growth.
Can you humour me a little? I have baby on my brain a lot these days, but as we dream, plan, consider birthing technique and desires vs. the cold-demands of a scientific medical system, I am often drawing parallels between what I experience as a long-distance runner and what I understand about giving birth. Okay before you start throwing things at me, I’m the first to affirm there is nothing quite as crazy or hardcore as giving birth, but the similarities are interesting. Also, in my defence some of the marathoning moms I’ve talked to feel that I’m not completely off-track here.
A feasibility analysis was completed and based on those data, the redevelopment, is expensive, but feasible with a balance among public, private equity and debt financing.
Yes I want RWD. Yes I know live in Colorado. Yes I know it's snowing outside. After riding in Focus with her super serious and amazing Michelin X-Ice Xi2 tires (my first snow tires and MY GOD! are they amazing) and then in a friend's new 4WD Patriot with all-seasons, I will admit that you do have more traction when accelerating in the snow. I don't know how the Patriot handles while sliding around in the snow because the driver was being boring and needlessly cautious. There was no cars around and not even any parked cars around and he totally could've goosed it a bit, but oh well, he was driving, not me.
A= Alphabet. Use alphabet stamps, stickers, etc.... in some way on your project
Add the oil and salt to the dough. Process until the dough forms a smooth, tacky ball that clears the sides of the bowl, about 30-60 seconds. Remove the dough from the bowl, knead briefly on a lightly oiled work surface, about 1 minute. Transfer to a lightly oiled bowl, cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate for at least 24 hours and up to 3 days. (After the period of refrigeration, the dough can be wrapped tightly in plastic wrap and frozen for later use.)
Today I am focused on the grocery list, however, and getting some food into the house for us to eat over then next five weeks--that's all we have until closing! It will be tricky to find the balance between having enough and none left over to move, but I am sure I can rise to the occasion. :)
That's my excuse for not blogging lately... well the new found hatred of the blogger interface and the bajillion reports I have to write by Thursday. Reports are not my favourite time of year.
Today I am sharing my most recent thank you cards made with the beautiful Clearly For You stamp set. I make a little card for everyone who places a Stampin' Up! order with me. I really enjoyed making this design.
To nominate yourself, simply follow the above link and post a comment addressing our selection criteria and explaining why you think you’ll make the perfect Hunger Busting Blogger?
Best practices: Patent Management Boards for Invention Screening, annuity decisions – A CPS Roundtable Discussion led by Dean Olson (Moderator) – Senior Corporate Counsel, Pfizer, Inc., Groton, Connecticut
Okay..so moving on...I am about to run out the door to my lesson for Bible Class ready in the morning then to go and hang out with the in-laws. So here is my Currently for May. Enjoy and I'll be back tomorrow with my Someone New Sunday! I've had a few more new bloggers come out of hiding and I can't wait to share them with you.
good-bye,
But wait, there is light in another direction... it is ironic, but I don't do much tangling unless it is for a book or class or some other project I'm working on. So another goal this year is to tangle, daily, just for fun. Just because. And I found the perfect way to do it! Carole Ohl has a new Zentangle daily calendar and it is SOOOOO lovely! Here's the ad that she has on her blog:
Maria Pallotta-Chiarolli is Senior Lecturer in the School of Health and Social Development at Deakin University, Melbourne. Her primary areas of interest are cultural, gender, sexual and family diversity and their various permutations. Twice winner of a Lambda Literary Award, Maria is also an External Faculty Member of Saybrook University, San Francisco, the Honorary Patron of PFLAG (Parents and Friends of Lesbians and Gays) Victoria, and Founding Member of AGMC Inc (Australian GLBTIQ Multicultural Council).
*UPDATE* For some reason the chosen fundraising site is not allowing people to donate less than $5.00. A new site is will be chosen soon for $1.00 donations. In the meantime, consider giving $5.00! We would only need 2,000 people to give $5.00 each to reach the goal! DONATE HERE! Thanks so much, and God bless!
huge
this loosely flapping sail of flesh
Whipping cream
Clooney and Roberts are seeking unspecified compensatory damages, along with “treble damages, punitive damages, attorneys’ fees and an injunction against further use of their names or images”.
Big dollop of runny honey (my boss brought in a jar of her Dad's own honey, score!)
--Deno’s Wonder Wheel
This is the one we all try and wriggle out of, because it hurts so much and anyway surely it can’t apply to this beautiful piece of scene-painting, possibly the best descriptive writing you’ve ever done? And what about the chapter where you finally managed to work in that really hilarious anecdote you’ve wanted to use for ages? Well, unless the descriptive passage and the humorous anecdote are truly relevant, I’m afraid it does, and moreover…
Guess what I've gotten done?
Truthfully, my hair right now is not my favorite look and I’ll tell anyone who asks.
#4. Freedom requires information and transparency. Secrets indicate manipulation; transparency creates confidence, responsibility, and accountability. In free environments everyone knows everything they need to know.
The buildings perfectly blot out the sky...
being forced to do anything
Decorative Trim : Dusty Attic
When you are driving at night you have to be extra cautious. You never know when a deer will decide to cross the road or when a dangerous bump or pot hole will appear. When an oncoming car approaches you must use great concentration to keep from focusing on and drifting towards the approaching lights. You must also fight against the sleepiness that the soothing darkness lulls upon you.
I hope you have a great Thursday. If you stop by, please leave a comment, so when I visit your blog, I can return the favor. God bless and hugs.
“Ummm... What just happened?” I ask, with marked confusion.
Exercises
"Stay away from the haters," Mrs. Obama said, and closed with a special message for the girls.
Hey kids! Dopesaw here.
Here ends a chapter, but a chapter only in the history of the origins of the Goldings varieties. If you think I've gone on for far too long already at least in part three: the epilogue there will be sex.
I hope everyone is enjoying a very happy and healthy holiday season so far. Best wishes to all! And many thanks for the amazing recipes you've sent in too. I am going to have one delicious weekend :)
PLEASE be specific with your name in the comment section, and IF YOUR NAME is listed as the winner, you must email me at stephanieelliot@gmail.com in order to claim your prize. Email me with your full name and address so I can have your book(s) sent to you.
On Carpooling:
to be pleased by the green of them
Six major flaws of the PAP’s immigration policies:
The actor David Hemmings helped the girls, then 15 and 16, record their first single. It fizzled. They toured with Thin Lizzy, Genesis, Donovan and The Chieftains. Four years later, in April of 1972, taking on the persona of beautifully-voiced acid folkies, they released Swaddling Songs. It also fizzled. The band dissolved and Alison and her guitarist moved to South Africa.
Bikes used in cross country mountain biking can be fully rigid frame, hardtails, or even full suspension frames. Through the years, the cross over to full suspension has become very popular.
Details will be shared shortly.
~ old Chinese proverb
studio-as-instrument, the importance she places on "chromatic"
January 30, 2007: "Dad, I have seen what hell must be like when we assaulted this compound. ... There were fathers bringing up their dead babies to me and shoving them into my arms for help."
... but the blocks section is the part which really appeals to me. I've got a similar book called How to Knit (now out of print, I think, my dad managed to find one for me second hand after I'd got a copy out of my local library) which contains lots of different stitch patterns and I really enjoying picking a new one and testing it out. The sheer number of blocks contained in 201 Knitting... and the fact that the blocks can be mixed and matched makes this a book I can see myself referencing again and again and spending many happy hours experimenting with the different designs.
Tails You Win Can’t Lose, originally Commando No 368 (November 1968), re-issued as No 1091 (January 1977).
Oh My ……….we are off to the Golden Corral (I call it the Golden Trough)! LOL. Good friends and food, don’t get no better than that.
Yes, funny is a good word, for now, and fits best since this is a non-swearing blog.
Virginie Ropars (her dolls are amazing!)
Alex Watkins, Tennessee Titans
But at least now, scientific research can shed light on some of the biological and physiological differences between men and women.
bore a thorny crown that I might have a glory-diadem,
I remember when, eons ago, I was banging my head not to metal, but to the fine sampled rhythms of underground hip-hop. I was (and still am) a hardcore fan and I can’t imagine not having a few hip-hoppers on my mobile phone to bad-ass around on my way to school.
Mary Ann Allison, Hofstra University. Reintegrating the Virtual with the Physical in Rome and New York
Meanwhile, I pray especially for grace and strength for the wounded and lost. Where there is hurting, may there be help. Where there is injury, may there be health. Where there is confusion and loss, may there be peace and the gift of knowing that if any of us is a child of G_d, then we all must be, and that we all are equally loved, equally cherished, just exactly as we are.
Stepmother has come forward and told the press that she suspected Cinderella of her father’s death, but still treated Cinderella as she treated her own daughters, she cared for and fed Cinderella and she shared the household chores among the three teenage girls, but Cinderella always seemed to finish her chores much faster than her stepsisters. Stepmother discovered Cinderella was controlling small animals such as birds and mice to do her chores while she lazed around. It was later discovered in the investigation that those birds and mice were actually the missing men and women from her village, transformed into animals, all of which has been changed back so as to testify against Cinderella.
Well, with all due respect and I’m very sorry for the security guard, but just how is this my concern? I’m presuming when he took the job the guard realised it was a high risk position. Or had he been told he’d be helping little old ladies with their shopping trolleys? I suspect not.
and work as a lumberjack to earn a living for himself and his mother. In his memoirs,
Heather Draper – Well, my sister tells a story about me furnishing shoe boxes with pictures cut out of the sears cataloged in grade school, which I am pretty thankful I don’t remember! I think it was something I have naturally done since then...but I really started to recognize it as a love with the early days of HGTV...loved Debbie Travis’s painted house, Sarah’s room service etc... Little embarrassed to admit it really...
In a “the-foot-bone’s-connected-to-the-ankle-bone” connectivity, Ms. West lays out this time line in order to show that they’re not isolated incidents. Instead, “…They fit into a pattern that above all spreads “dhimmitude,”… in thrall to Islamic law.” In other words, if the Western people watch long enough, it’ll scare them into line.
Lactic Acid – Found in blood and muscle tissue. Also in sour milk, beer, sauerkraut, pickles, and other food products made by bacterial fermentation. Used in skin fresheners, as a preservative, in the formation of plasticizers, etc. Alternative: plant milk sugars, synthetics.
we decided to hang out in our jammies all morning.
Most marketing messages through any media are in English, that’s because it is the most feasible, most economically and most widely spoken language in the world. All is fair and well but what about those individuals that don’t understand English, or understand minimal English. What happens to your brand message when it reaches that individual. Lost in translations perhaps or just ignored entirely because it makes no sense to them?
Oh, and I'm not at work.
“Is this really true Papa?”
I dabbed the paint on, making sure to go straight down and not at an angle, so it doesn’t get under the stencil.
Doctors at public hospitals and some private practices also kicked off a 24-hour strike over health care spending cuts, while striking local government workers occupied town halls across Greece for four hours.
I know he won't be in the military forever, but until he is out for sure and we can stay in one place I feel like it's going to be extremely difficult for me to have a successful career doing something I love. Heck, even having the opportunity to finish school in one place would be nice, which at this point won't happen since we don't have too much time left in Virginia.
If you'd like a button for your blog sidebar, you can use this one...
General participation is requested :) Visit the blogs and check out these beautiful stamps in action!! We can't wait for you to join us!!!
linen
It takes a lot of courage to start something when you really don’t know what the final act is going to entail. I was reminded today just how much it takes.
Those cardinals just outside
You see, wifesy is the only person I have truly ever felt safe with. Tax deductions and sex-capades for babies, aside. I truly feel safe and perfectly myself when I’m with her.
We planted our tomatoes late this year, and they're just ripening. I am SOOOOOOOOO excited!
It’s an idea I have been toying with for a while now. Let’s face it my real name is short and simple. It sounds good and has a good flow to it. Why wouldn’t I be willing to use it? Besides being terribly shy, I like my privacy. The thought of putting my true self out there for others to see is scary. (I really am shy though I have taught myself to be outgoing and friendly. It’s become second nature now and no one believes I’m shy!) Besides if I use a pen name and no one likes what I write no one will know it was me unless I tell them.
I've came full circle.
My husbands mother got released from prison and is going go be in a halfway house near us so that’s been anxiety inducing for sure. I guess a lot has been on my mind but that’s all I feel up to sharing for now.
Degree holder engineers allege that the important posts of executive engineers, who head any project execution team, are being filled with diploma holder engineers by ignoring their qualification and claim.
and while we received (and still do sometimes) criticism about private school,
que un asunto o causa pendiente en esta Corte Suprema solo se considera decidido una vez registrada, promulgada y publicada la sentencia en la escribania, y que hasta entonces el resultado de la votacion se estima como una materia absolutamente reservada y confidencial, perteneciente exclusivamente a las camaras interiores de la Corte.
Honestly, I couldn’t have been prouder of his answer. Other answers included:
State Representative Carl Seel, who introduced the bill, was joined by Sheriff Joe Arpaio, State Senator Lori Klein, and others in support of the bill. Important new information was revealed during the news conference including a request by Sheriff Joe Arpaio to the current head of the Selective Service Board to investigate the criminal forgery committed in the case of Barack Obama’s Selective Service registration. In addtion, Carl Seel reveals some of the resistance that other Republicans are creating to stop the bill from even heading to a vote.
In the end I had to face lots of the same problems as other "love exiles". I had to give up my career and move far away from my family. This is being felt even more now that my Mother is dealing with declining health and I would like to be there for her. But as it is, if I need to be in the U.S. for a longer period of time, I have to choose between being with my wife or being with my American family. It's really rather unfair, and it makes me into a second-class citizen... one who STILL needs to pay American taxes even though I don't live in the country.
As a judge, here's the list of items I check when performing the harness and hitch judging. Note: other judges may or may not check the same things I check.
I know from the comics that the situation never improves, there's never any "cure" and it's only in recent months - almost 100 issues into the run - that the series has even begun to hint at the possibility of moving past constant survival situations and towards rebuilding some semblance of civilization. I've never been a fan of the comic before - Kirkman's weaknesses as a writer, such as the flatness of his characters and the methodical-as-a-bricklayer pacing and unimaginative plotting, are hard to ignore - but I have to admit I've been reading with some small interest these last few months as the series has begun to inch towards the establishment of a new society. Why? Because this is something different, this is something we've never really seen before in survival horror: rebuilding from the ground up after almost everything else has been destroyed. I don't know where this story will go, but the political theorist in me wants to see if the series will commit to this new direction, or if it's just a feint before the inevitable (and boring) return to the road.
Then I went upstairs. The stairs creaked and groaned and made lots of noises that stairs make when a family has gone up and down them for ages. That’s good. Stairs should do that sort of thing. One knows exactly which step squeaks and which one doesn't and where one has to tread if one doesn't want to make oneself heard. It was just that this staircase wasn't our staircase. Quite a different family had used it. Therefore I thought this staircase was creepy.
was terrible.
House Foreign Affairs Committee Chairwoman Ileana Ros-Lehtinen, R-Fla., had questioned the Obama administration’s request for $147 million for the Palestinian Authority at a time when P.A. President Mahmoud Abbas has demanded preconditions for returning to the negotiations while also pushing a unilateral statehouse plan at the United Nations. She also expressed concern that $26.4 million had been requested for projects in Hamas-run Gaza.
* 1 cup grated Monterrey Jack
I remember how embarrassed I was when my mom and dad read my first book. I imagine it's as hard for parents to picture their kids having steamy bed messing sex as it is for us to think of our parents doing "The dance without any pants." Okay, so I don't write bodice ripping scenes where the heroine throws her forearm across her head and swoons naked into her gorgeous lovers arms. Not because I'm prude but only because they're not historically accurate. If an English nobleman met that fiery vixen, he'd have to get through close to and depending on the era, ten petticoats before he could feast upon the family jewels.
“Most voters agree that marijuana law enforcement should be a low priority. Holton used prosecutorial resources to go after state-approved medical marijuana providers. That’s wasteful and unnecessary. That’s just part of why Dwight’s not right for attorney general.
"I am Telenstil and this is Gytha, one of Saint Cuthbert's staunch followers," said Telenstil. "I have many questions for both of you, but this is not the place."
John Smith’s Grand National Record: 2010 Can’t Buy Time (Fell 8th); 2011 Can Buy Time (Fell 18th)
However, he did also admit that Greece’s debt is 120% of GDP, that the interest rate it pays on its borrowings is up to 5%, and that it is suffering 6% negative growth.
The large Scottish Qualifications Association envelope sits on the kitchen table, unopened. I glance at the clock for the 3rd time in 5 minutes. It’s only quarter past nine.
David Johnson
And then kicker:
As I get older and our family branches from direction to direction, I can’t quite hold onto the winters of my past. They were simple and uncomplicated and full of beauty and I miss them.
I’m not talking about the job description, and I’m not talking about how you do a job. I’m talking about what a particular person has to do to be successful. Make a list those qualities. It could be two or three things; it could be 10. Whatever those things are, you have to go out and find people who have a giftedness to match those qualities so that you put the right people in the right place.
Like a good lady, she has brought me many top name golf balls, Titleist, Calloway, Nike, tilly certainly has earned her keep today, with an exceptional tally of 15 quality golf balls.
- In a bowl, add in garlic and cooked noodles. Pour ground pork mixture over the noodles and garnish with cucumbers, bean sprouts, and fried egg.
A governing system that evolved slowly, organically, over centuries, born of the particular temperament and desires and abilities of a certain people: Can it be yanked from a container-ship on the other side of the world and slipped on intact like a pair of trousers?
"Oh yeah," I said, "I'd forgotten about that one!"
1 overturned
I’d love to hear your ideas on this. I think there are many ways to develop Christian worldview, and we’re always looking for new ideas. Here are seven ways we’re currently working to teach worldview to our kids:
When our class presentations are finally finished, my colleague and I pack up our stuff, and take our respective trains. I take the Yamanote and Chiyoda lines to Kita-Senju and change to the Isesaki line and head home. I study the other passengers. They look at their phones. Their iPods. Their gaming devices. They read their books. Their newspapers. Their comics. Or they sleep. Nobody looks at anyone else. It is considered untoward.
Yup, parents of twins, us barely grown ourselves...
LET US KNOW WHAT YOUR TOP 10 FAVORITE'S ARE!!!
Unknown to any of us, Jonathan suffered from arteriovenous malformation (AVM), a condition in which the blood vessels in the brain rupture. AVMs are defects of the circulatory system that are generally believed to occur during embryonic or fetal development. The malformations tend to be discovered only incidentally, usually either at autopsy or during treatment for an unrelated disorder. Google arteriovenous malformations if you wish to learn more about AVMs.
Above her bathroom sink
” I am feeding them so it is my right. ” she defends.” I am growing old too. don’t have more strength than this to look after them”.
I also didn't get the killers ultimate motives. The final scene basically reveals his plan. He stalks out ATM's beforehand, he figures out the camera angles and how far out he needs to be to not be spotted by them. The movie ends with the bad friend (Josh Peck) and the lady friend (Alice Eve) dying and the good friend (Brian Geraghty) is left alive. The ATM camera footage only shows the good friend going crazy, killing that janitor (who was an idiot for not saying anything or noticing the bodies piling up outside or the HELP sign on the window), what looks like him killing Josh Peck, and just going insane. So I think, OK, so this masked maniac set this up to screw with these random strangers in the ATM, have them kill each other and let one of them take the fall and get arressted. It's genious because he's not on camera. Except...there are actions that occur outside the ATM while all 3 friends are inside that were caught on camera. Such as the 2 cars being rammed into the front of the ATM, and the water being poured into the ATM from the back. If it wasn't for the good friend smashing the ATM screen and damaging the camera, all that stuff would have been caught on said camera, and showing there was as third party on the outside.
Please double space – so much easier to read. Be kind to my eyes I’m already ridiculously short sighted.
19But do you, without waiting, go after their army, attacking them from the back; do not let them get into their towns, for the Lord your God has given them into your hands.
dormant in our collective unconscious or even genetic code. People
Off we set for the tarmac in the distance. As we approach you just know that this plane has only just got in, as the last bags and a assisted passenger are still coming off.
RSVP: events@idlewildbooks.com
Both pieces are beauties and I am so happy to be able to share them with you. Friends, please send me your finishes too so I may post them up on ~*Friday Finishes*~ for all to see!
‘Workshop – Creativity and Creative Problem Solving’ - David Hall
9.Shame Club "Jonestown" from Come On
Now for the Good News:
Why is it that anti-tax folks presume that the correct level for our national enterprise is even lower than the faultless private sector can achieve?
My first experience my husband and I attended the movie as a date night. As soon as we were seated our server approached and took our drink order. While waiting for our drinks we were able to look over the menu and decide on what we wanted. For appetizer we ordered the fried mozzarella batons. For dinner I ordered the chicken fingers and my husband ordered the Southwest Chicken wrap.
Okuda has worked on almost every Trek show right back to the 5th movie in the mid-80s, so visually he understands the franchise better than anyone. “Rather than trying to make something which looked ‘state of the art’, we’re trying to build upon the style of the 1960s.” So the guide became ‘what would they have done back in the 60s if they could have?’
During one Christmas tour, Derek became very friendly with an acrobat called Sally, who had recently joined us. Sally knew he didn’t mate with females, but still used to hug and kiss him in a friendly sort of way, which didn’t seem to bother Derek. So no one took much notice when the two spent many hours chatting and dancing together at the New Year’s Eve party. And when Sally followed Derek back to his trailer that night, it was surely just for a friendly cup of coffee to see in the New Year.
Rutabaga
She loved to grab my 'yard' shoes that sat by the back porch door and run with them to get me to chase her around the yard. One day she got it and I didn't follow her so she laid it down on the sidewalk and when I would start out to get it she would grab it. I just went back in the porch. She sat there a few minutes and then disappeared so I went out to pick up the shoe and she flew out from the corner of the house and grabbed it just as I reached for it and ran. She had set a trap for me and waited out of sight. She was way too smart for her britches!
It’s funny stuff and CABIN continually uses the technicians to set or break the overall mood of the film. When the kids arrive, get settled, and start playing Truth or Dare, we cut back to the technicians to find them gambling on the outcome of the scenario. Both parties are feeling good but only the technicians know what’s coming. When a new security guard wonders how they can gamble when the outcome is rigged, Richard corrects him, “We just get them into the cellar. They take it from there.”
Thank you, Father Newman, for your leadership in the sacred liturgy!
3˜Government/Civics
Keep a look out!
Not sure what this means: I’ve been on the X98 the last couple, three days and it’s half empty from Wetherby (where it was full before I moved back to Leeds). I postulate it is a sign of the times: mass unemployment reduces the footfall on public transport: this in turn will reduce the overall income of this public function and the knock on effect will be higher price, followed by still lower footfall. This ain’t over yet!
Mix all ingredients together. Chill one hour in the refrigerator. Form into small smalls (I use a small cookie scoop to measure out each one). Roll each ball in additional confectioner's sugar. Store in an airtight container. These can be made in advance and stored in the freezer until needed.
" SJP demonizes and delegitimizes Israel as an “apartheid”, “colonialist”, “oppressor” state and openly advocates and practices boycotts, divestments, sanctions (BDS) against Israel, creating an openly hostile environment for Israel supporters.
Masumura’s brilliant adaptation of a novel by Yoriyoshi Arima tells the story of a young nurse (Ayako Wakao) stationed at an army hospital in 1939, at the time of the Sino-Japanese war. Appearing at a time when Japanese studios are producing largely escapist fare; when independent distributors in the UK and in the US are unearthing more sensationalist work: pinky violence, roman porno and yakuza eiga of the 70s and 80s; while Tartan Video releases J-horror under its Asian Extreme banner and Criterion continues to burnish its catalogue of digitally re-mastered Ozu, Kurosawa, and Mizoguchi — the DVD release by Fantoma of Masumura’s early B&W war film Red Angel is truly a newsworthy event. The film adds enormously to our appreciation of Masumura, of whom we know only a fraction of the 58 feature length films he shot during his long and productive career.
Brush both sides of ciabtta roll with olive oil. Cook eggs until over medium. Lay cooked eggs on roll, add bacon and cheese and transfer to panini press. Cook 4-5 minutes or until golden brown.
We are a continual ‘work in progress’ as we expand our thoughts beyond the ego and create a life full of meaning. Everyone has been hurt at some time but it is in how we ‘go beyond’ the hurt where we grow. Forgiving is a part of that process and who forgiveness benefits is…you.
APPOINTMENTS AND DEADLINES
1/2 cup pomegranate seeds (substitute dried cranberries if desired)
With blameless bliss, Lx
If you are interested in learning about how a water tower works check out this article I found.
Their chant shall be a chant of paradise,
the glides
Heather worked in several home décor shops while attending university, where she realized that her passion was in interior design. While working at Cushy Life in Calgary, she obtained a certificate of interior decoration and proceeded to launch her own design firm, Eden Interiors in 2003. In 2007, Heather and then business partner Jonalyn Siemens brought Bespoke to Victoria and the store has been thriving here ever since.
Back in doggy
The Huntsville Islamic Center will present a panel discussion during the workshop and answer questions from the audience.
Be sure to visit all the Paper Pretties' blogs to see their spin on the challenge:
This atrocity must be exposed.
talus garden
22.CIRCUS LUPUS "We Are The One (rare)"
Im planning my wedding to a man I adore, I have have a head full of ideas Im thrilled with for new work, and I am starting to be know (for the right reasons) in my work.
Man, trot sets are boring. Pandora Radio helps.
The next clue we get it when Jamie forms a brief alliance with his cellmate, a man dressed as a Redcoat soldier who claims to be from 1745. We also get more anachronistic technology when General Smythe departs in a cupboard-like box which has materialised in his office. When Zoe shows them the hidden video screen in Smythe's office Carstairs and Lady Jennifer decide to go against orders and trust the Doctor, and his friends. Whilst escaping in Lady Jennifer's ambulance the group drive off, seem to disappear and then reappear elsewhere, only when the do, they turn to see a Roman charriot rushing towards them. And once again another layer of this intricate story is revealed.
The other problem was that, although the cycle of panic had been broken, I had no strategies on hand to use when I felt the symptoms return in the future (generally at times of high perfectionist stress – such as examination time at uni). Now for the good stuff …
Firstly just a quick word on your fabulous stitching entries, as ever, we've been blown away by your wonderful work. We'll be back to announce the winner in a week.
For matter of budget, effort, basically not wanting to mess with them, I kept our cabinets intact. I painted them bright white with some super duper paint my paint store guy recommended. Truly, it will change your life if you use it. (but I'm too lazy to go to the basement to get the name of it....if you'd like the name jingle me.) I changed all the hardware...all brushed nickel bin pulls and handles now. Loves them. But before we get to all that....take a look up there at the bulkhead. From the day we moved in it looked gross, dirty, spackley...yuck.
I wanted to wish you all a merry Christmas and an excellent new year! But most of all I want to than you for your support with the blog! And as a Christmas gift I leave you the recipe of a coconut cake that I prepared for the Christmas tea time. It is very typical from Argentina and that I absolutely love!!!
~You are slobbering like crazy..... hopefully you get a tooth soon.
Me: Brownies.
Whatever it is, it's not for everybody. The Scarlet Empress was a box-office flop. But look, if you're feeling cheated, if you want the awards season biopic you were promised, all is not lost. As it happens, there is one grand tragedy in The Scarlet Empress, one character whose fatal flaw leads him headlong into catastrophe.
If we’re not careful, we can read those words like we might read about the departure of a loved one at the airport. But there is something more — much more — happening behind these verses. And Acts 2 gives us more insight into that reality.
Jenson, Lisa. “Murder at a House Party with Unlikely Wise Men.” The San Francisco Chronicle. February 20, 1985.
What things did you get that you would recommend I include in our boxes?
Get your weight under control! Enlist the help of friends and family to achieve your goals. Encourage your friends and family to join you in your journey! There is strength in numbers. Weight loss and management are keys to a long and healthy life.
Add the breadcrumbs to a large skillet set over medium-high heat. Cook, stirring often, until the breadcrumbs are toasted. Transfer the breadcrumbs to a large bowl and place the skillet back over the heat. Spray with nonstick cooking spray, then add the onion and garlic, cooking for about 3-4 minutes, stirring occasionally, until the onions soften. Transfer the onion/garlic mixture to the bowl with the breadcrumbs and allow to cool slightly.
And we come to the theme for this post: no more statistics. It has two meanings. The first and most important is the desire to see no more senseless deaths of cyclists. I don’t know what that will take. There is no single silver bullet. But the effort is worthwhile if I don’t have to participate in another event like last night.
1. Susheela Raman "Like a Rolling Stone" 6:28
The president’s condition of an express promise from the opposition to stop attacks could complicate Mr Annan’s attempts to bring an end to more than a year of violence that the UN says has killed more than 9,000 people.
Grist & such
My dirty little secret is that I don’t know anything about photography. Well, my two dirty little secrets are a lack of photographic knowledge and that I fuck models for money. If my parents knew, they’d shit bricks.
Padded Tush Stats recently released surveys for the Softbums Omni All in Two Cloth Diapering System. After numerous calls for survey respondents on social networking sites, blogs, and cloth diapering community forums, we received 48 responses.
The presenter talked about how we, as humans are so valuable. We have been put on this earth because we are so valuable as people. We are not cheap rip offs of each other (human clones), but we are valuable ‘originals’ in our own right, and this is something I totally agree with.
10 Hallelujah (Robin, Grey,Youmans) 4:01
I love Neil Gaiman, Clive Barker, Susan Clarke, H.P. Lovecraft. Outisde of the genre, Jonathan Franzen is a fantastic writer and I can’t get enough of Kurt Vonnegut. Ultimately though, I’m a child of Stephen King. He’s the author that first opened me up to the possibilities of storytelling. I remember sneaking The Shining from my parents room when I was a kid and being absolutely petrified by what I read. King taught me the power of words.
...it's no use crying in this place; there's nobody to console one but oneself. I've lived in Oseyri now for over sixty years. Perhaps you young people will be able to become human beings, even if we older ones haven't succeeded. But it's late already. And there's nothing so good as sleep, both for those who are blind and for those who still have their sight. So we'll look after one another a little, so far as we can, if we should wake again to-morrow. There's so little people can do for each other in this place. Good night. Salka Valka's story is the story of loneliness, despair, politics, power, compassion, lust, poverty, fish, and the Salvation Army. Most of all it is the story of a love strong enough to make the ultimate sacrifice; a noble, strong generosity of heroic proportions.
given still more power and money with which to "help the needy." The
The 2009 email shows the ATF officials had then become aware of Kingery’s alleged grenade trafficking.
that bit by bit.
Well it looks like its loaded, have a look its a pretty impressive fountain of cola! It was caused by a chemical reaction between the cola and the salt crystals. It is called nucleation apparently!
Olay Pro-X facial moisturizer or facial cleanser $5/1
The difference in the two major river regimes is marked: while the White Nile’s average monthly maximum (October) and minimum (February) discharges vary only slightly from 1.4 billion cubic meters (bcm) to 1.2 bcm, theBlue Nile and associated rivers (Atbara – which joins the main Nile at Atbara north of Khartoum – and the Sobat which joins the White Nile just as the river emerges from the Sudd) vary greatly from a high of 15.6 bcm in August to just 0.3 bcm in April.
Have a happy workweek, everyone!
First thing I did was check the Three Word Wednesday site. Much to my delight the words were—bloody and kinky—words that both end in a long “e” sound.
(ie tomorrow night)
~ On the same day, a person at the South Pole would also see the sun skim the horizon, beginning six months of uninterrupted daylight.
(root_nsu1c308)@/parag/pkgs/vxvm4/4.0/sparc # ls -l
Dakota is now pain free.
Joe and John were identical twins. Joe owned an old dilapidated boat and kept pretty much to himself. One day he rented out his boat to a group from out-of-state who sank it. Joe spent all day trying to salvage as much stuff as he could and was out of touch all that day and most of the evening. Therefore, Joe did not know that his brother John's wife had died suddenly that day. When Joe got back on shore he went into town to pick up a few things at the grocery.
Unfortunately, for Sheri, it was the worst decision she ever made.
Here is a picture of me throwing myself out of a crane that happened to be 300 foot up in the air. Not one for the light hearted among us. Although this was only the first bungee jump I did, along with eleven other mad people, including two of my brothers (you can imagine how pleased my Mum was, she was far more nervous than we were!). I went on to do an even higher one the following year to help another child and her family go on a dolphin swimming and their dream holiday.
Everybody asked
Another craving came to my mind: yakitori. Yakitori is skewered grilled chicken from Japan. I really think that this is a simple dish to make and a highly demanded menu especially for college kids. I secretly want to open a yakitori shop at Harvard Square and make some business.
For a good TV, the show has got to have high-energy performers. Kim Sarang is a solid choice to provide that high energy, hopefully coupled with interesting electronica tones from his first album.
Spray can paint on board, matches, a cigarette and a box on board
We had broken up, and I said that it would be best not to speak, so that both of us could heal. Two weeks of silence passed, and then he called.
~ jute/twine, Wal-Mart, 2$ (again, there's lots left, but I did get it especially for this project)
In a heavy skillet, heat bacon grease & gradually add flour, stirring constantly until roux becomes light brown. Add onion, green pepper, and celery; cook 5 minutes. Cooks grits according to package directions and add to roux. Add tomatoes and ham. Sprinkle with bacon & chopped onions & serve. Serves 6.
Orale, Del Norte’s Mexican style lager pours a nice golden color (bet it’s the corn) with a white head and there’s a sweet smell to it. The taste hints of grain (the corn again, I’d bet) with a mildly dry finish. It strikes me as more hoppy than, say a Budweiser and more carbonated than your run-of-the mill beers with a very slight alcohol bite to it.
-Whitmire gets roughed up in the Fantasy Bookies NBA league
While I was compiling a recent post to mark 4 years of blogging, I was astonished to see that I had never blogged about sambar! Sambar is a staple at my house. I make it almost every week or every other week to accompany our dosas and idlies for breakfast and dinner and also with rice and poriyals for lunch. It is a versatile dish to be served for breakfast, lunch and dinner. I try to make different versions by rotating the vegetables I use. This is my mom's recipe for sambar. It sounds like a difficult procedure, but it is so easy to make.
Arthur Goldstuck, the managing director of technology research company World Wide Worx, said this was the first time a major multinational invested financial muscle and expertise in the small to medium enterprise sector, as opposed to a generic offering of money that was not applied to a specific outcome.
So, I tell you all of this because I want 'you to understand why I want to jump in a cold lake. Because to get uncomfortable is to lead to rewards that you've never dreamt of. What is the reward for jumping in the cold lake? That's part of the discomfort, usually we don't know until we do it, what it is all leading to.
5 cloves garlic
Ah, what the hey. I don't know that this project will actually do any good, but it's kind of nice to have an excuse to post about something completely mundane.
I don't know about you, but every year I start out with good intentions with New Year's resolutions. It seems that by Jan. 31st, they are already gone and out of my mind. So this year, I came up with an idea. I decided to take my most important resolution, along with Adam's, and create art prints based on these resolutions. That way we can frame them and have them displayed all year. Plus, we can always use more prints for our living room wall. I'll be sure to share them when I'm finished! But I also thought, if you're like me, and maybe need a nice reminder all year long, you might want something like this too!
Have a great Thursday!
Good morning everybody!
Cap.:”There is only one God, ma’am. And I’m pretty sure he doesn’t dress like that.”
She reached forward for the shears. At first she thought they’d just fallen into the ivy, but then she saw how the leaves seemed to have twisted and entwined round the handles, just like the tree branches, curling and wrapping. She moved closer, treading carelessly on the ivy tendrils that reached out towards the lawn, brushing away the pointed leaves that grazed her face.
I've been making blown beads for the past couple months. They started out round, like big hollow marbles, and evolved into hollow sea shells. Don't ask how that happened, I'm not sure myself. It's one of those magical things that happen when I have plenty of quiet time to torch and "listen" to the glass.
… Hal Mumme of New Mexico State continues to be our resident contrarian in the coaching fraternity. He had undefeated Hawaii No. 1 on his ballot.
It didn't help matters much that I was in a minor accident that blew out both passengers' side tires on my vehicle - my ONLY vehicle. Did I tell you that this hasn't been a good time to be me? No? Thought I'd have mentioned that....
I went for my glucose test at week 24 and that is when I found out I had gestational diabetes. This was just before Christmas 2008. I was devastated. Not just because of the food but because it was another hurdle. I managed to control my GD with diet and didn’t have to take any drugs or inject insulin and amazingly I actually lost weight. Who loses weight when they are pregnant??
filled with the promise of a brighter tomorrow
For now…I have a decision to make. Feel free to leave me a comment…tell me what you think…I really want to know.
Iván Meade – How would you describe your style?
On May 2, in yet another preliminary parliament session debating the allocation of a 99-strong committee to draft amendments to the constitution, the opposition are objecting the role of the House speaker in this process, as they accuse him to have the power to pre-select 22 non-MP committee candidates (such as academics and NGOs) before the parliament decides on them.
A World Away - Nancy Grossman
Aside from the Spratlys, China and the Philippines have contested ownership of offshore areas near northwestern Palawan where the Philippine government has invited foreign investors to explore for oil and gas. It’s near those waters where U.S. marines would train Filipino counterparts in defending an oil rig from security threats in the current exercises, Philippine military officials said.
Recommended for those who enjoy slow building relationships and anti-badboy leads; bonus for Sato Ryuta fans.
6:40pm: Special project
Pace: 5 ; Parry: 7; Toughness: 16 (3)
I love, love, LOVE this album cover! That is really the main reason I bought this album. I want a cowgirl outfit like the girl on the cover! I'm planning a dude ranch vacation this year and I think an outfit like that would make me very popular - maybe even catch me a rugged cowboy! I didn't really expect much from the album itself - figured it was just one of those low-budget so-so records. But I really enjoyed it and found myself singing along with the songs I knew. Unfortunately, the song I was really looking forward to hearing has some skips ("Pistol Packin' Mama"), but "A Cowboy Has to Sing" and "El Rancho Grande" make up for it. After listening to "A Cowboy Has to Sing", I just want to yodel. (Anyone have some good yodeling records to share?) And since I speak Spanish fluently and know the words to "El Rancho Grande", listening to this version just cracks me up. Oh, I couldn't find a release date on this, but I'm figuring late 1950s or early 1960s. Gosh, I just can't get enough of that cover! It is definitely going up on my wall - LOVE it! So, I hope you get as much enjoyment from this as I did! (BTW, if anyone can give me some recommendations of some good dude ranches, I'd appreciate it!)
After Mat’s act, there was an interval and one of the other acts – smiling broadly – just looked at me and said: “Jesus!”
1 small red chili, flesh sliced and a few seeds reserved
Teenagers’ love of energy drinks is taking a terrible toll on their teeth, scientists have warned.
All news conferences are held at the Las Vegas Convention Center, Room N242, unless otherwise noted. News Conferences in Room N242 can only be scheduled on the hour. Exhibitors interested in reserving the room should complete the News Conference Scheduling Form.
We run to be dynamic. And fierce. And powerful.
10. Room With A View
My day was about bows and lots of them...and she is the very best at ribbons and bows...
And I’ve seen enough to know where to stand
At this point.. there are some reports of NO damage to the 3400 barrels of depleted uranium stored at this levelled factory…. but I cannot find any pictures (or video) to confirm the barrels undamaged / intact.
Christ Church Primary School, Upper Armley, Leeds!
Fill up your Kindle and get your children reading this summer with these 15 books, free on Kindle only on April 19 during the Give Your Child A Free Kindle Book (or 15 of Them!) Promotion. The list includes picture books, middle grade novels, and young adult books spanning a range of topics from sports, to paranormal, to historical, to educational. Selected books include the Florida Historical Society’s Best Children’s book of its year, books that have been recommended in Best Books for Young Teen Readers Grades 7-10 and in an edition of Children’s Book of the Year compiled by the Child Study Children’s Book Committee in New York City, and a finalist in the Valley Forge Romance Writers Sheila contest and in the Florida Romance Writers Golden Palm contest.
"Is she in any playgroups?" the mom asked.
I've had other milk stouts before (Left Hand Milk Stout). Perhaps I should try another type of imperial stout. This is my first one, so others might be different. I don't think it's the booziness, per se, as my beloved Belgian browns are pretty high in alcohol as well.
Same as yesterday, I met Alex, Kate and Myriam on the upstairs porch of our hotel for breakfast: tea, (coffee for Kate), and slices of pale toast with butter. Myriam had bought some mangoes and pineapple, so the kitchen sliced those up for our breakfast, too. The fruit was out of this world! Alex kindly provided the tea. He travels with his own stash, like I do. Though I completely forgot this time, I was so preoccupied with remembering to bring things I never travel with like bug spray, malaria pills, and my own quick-dry bath towel.
Court actions started by pharmaceutical companies usually delay or even stop appearance of generics in the market. This causes big harm not only to companies producing generics or consumers but also to those Governments that pay for the treatments of their population. This may be one of the reasons of the Portuguese Government attempt to establish the new dispute resolution reported by Baptista, Monteverde & Asociados in their last Newsletter (here) (pdf alert):
When perusing the inter web, there seems to be a lot of controversial discussion on detox and cleanse. Doctors claim that cleansing is a marketing ploy and that shocking your system does not necessarily damage your body, but it certainly doesn’t jump start it into a healthy state. Some doctor’s claim that any weight lost is due to lack of protein in the body. Other’s claim that dehydration from lack of water and a shortness of sodium throughout the body to produce electrolytes can result in total fatigue. Yet, I have also been in the hospital where a “detoxifying” diet was encouraged in order to flush the system of poisons. I have eaten my share of vegetables and downed gallons of diluted apple juice in order to be rewarded with my freedom from the confining hospital walls. Medically, I am torn. Yet, I believe that gaining nutrients naturally is far more effective than popping vitamins like a drug addiction. My body reacts adversely to taking vitamins. I get sick. I throw up. I get completely exhausted and sleep for hours after taking them. The most recent addition to my vitamin intake has been a reaction where my hands clamp up like an inner-palm charlie horse causing my hands to go into a “claw-like” state and hurt immensely. After some research, this is proven to be a reaction to vitamins most often or a lack of vitamin D. I certainly had not been lacking in natural vitamin D or vitamin D within my multivitamin, so I have stopped taking vitamins yet again in my life.
One of the guys that we hung around with on campus reeked of ‘coolness’. He was brown and yummy – but completely not my type. For starters, he was a tiny guy – like I could snap him in half if I tried to ride him like a bronco. He had a strong jaw line and soft round lips; he was definitely attractive and I always loved to appreciate boys of beauty, even if I couldn’t picture myself actually screwing them.
1327 **D-X/31/1999. “Molly Bloom, Her Will and Testament (June 17, 1904).” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Lodge, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(12), above, pp. 514-30.)
Who knows what these will evolve into? I don't... but I am having the time of my life bringing them to life. ~ Lori
“Aunt Elizabeth was supposed to marry someone when she was younger. He was a soldier and he never came home from the war.”
I don't like working with beads myself. I always drop them all over the floor at some point.
This makes me a hypocrite, of course. I fully admit this. I got married in church, not because I needed to declare my love for my husband in front of an imaginary omnipotent entity in the sky, but because I knew it would mean a lot to my mum. I said so in my speech at the reception, in fact, telling the guests I’d agreed to get married in church as long as Mum agreed to cook me Sunday dinner every week until she dies. (16 years on, that deal is still a stroke of genius on my part, I can tell you, although I have a feeling that after this blog entry I might have to dust off my roasting dish).
Lets say you started off with a $300,000 mortgage in 2007. Your amortization was for 30 years and you locked into the 5 year quick close rate of 5.19%. This would make your mortgage payment $$1635.26 per month. If you did not do any lump sum payments, and you did not change your mortgage to a bi-weekly rapid payment your remaining balance would be roughly $276,008.65. You would also have 25 years of mortgage payments left.
Welcome Oasis Seekers! We're doing it again. Offering a crit from the 6 awesome ladies here! Let's do a query crit this time. And because we dropped the ball last time and forgot to pick a winner, we'll pick two winners!
In another year she'll probably be taking the option of attending college full-time during her senior year of high school as our small rural school doesn't have a lot more to offer her in terms of courses. While I'm sure she's ready, I'm not sure ol' dad is ready to be done with raising this gal.
One solution to being able to record fretless bass sounds in my own demos is to get a decent sample library of fretless bass, played well, and stitch bass parts together, using a MIDI editor or keyboard. That’s ok, but it’s very slow. It lacks immediacy. There is a lot less spontaneity. Arguably, I am a worse keyboard player than I am a bass player. At least on bass, some of my guitar playing skills, which I have been trying to perfect (or at least make adequate) for four decades, might find a use.
So if you are new here and visiting from Sew, Mama, Sew!, welcome! It's nice to have you here.
These included sugar masks the simplest, because it only takes two tablespoons of sugar and three tablespoons of warm water. Combine the two ingredients until evenly distributed, then rub on the skin of the face mask, until the water level is low. After that wash your face with a towel soaked in warm water.
Anytime a newspaper goes through a redesign, some people are going to hate it, and they will be vocal. And the complaints are almost always the same.
You've played gigs in prisons and gyms – why do you choose to play these less traditional 'venues'?
Will reply to all your lovely comments tomorrow (sorry just don't have any spare time right now! aaarghhh) ♥
The book is divided into three sections; Plant Portraits, Family Problem-Solving Guides, and Organic Solutions to Common Problems.
We have really enjoyed studying famous artists with O and her friends at school, and we are looking forward to continuing these projects with the Montessori children next school year!
Some years ago, the European Tour Operators Association (ETOA) produced a study which concluded: "There appears to be little evidence of any benefit to tourism of hosting an Olympic Games and considerable evidence of damage." It added that predictions to the contrary by the politicians attempting to justify the outlay of their taxpayers' money "form part of a tradition".There’s no evidence either that they will lead to any increase in participation in sport (as if that was government’s business anyway). And if you dare to complain about the whole gravy train you risk being branded as a killjoy:
Jesse: I just…I don’t wanna be one of those people who are…getting divorced at 52 and falling down into tears admitting that they never really loved their spouse, and they feel that their life has been (waves his hand, as if being pulled) sucked up into a vacuum cleaner! You know, I want a great life. I want her to have a great life. She deserves that! Alright? But we’re just living in a pretense of a marriage, responsibility and all these…just…ideas of how people are supposed to live. Then I…I have these dreams…
Berenstain Bear books - Lend a Helping Hand (works with Goodness too I think), And the Bully, The Golden Rule, Too Much Teasing, Love they Neighbors
He is a big ass hot man with hands the size of dinner plates. He hasn’t been in a relationship for several years with anyone he didn’t just pick up for the fun of it and toss her out when she said too many damned words. He’s got a few . . . . issues. After all, my mother was his step-mother. (A loud groan would be appropriate at this point.) We were both 7 when our parents married. He has become very popular with Mom since she thinks I blocked him on Facebook along with her and my sister. He just goes along and laughs about it. He is far more family to me than the original blood relatives.
Me: Sorry not sure what you’re talking about. I was told back then that they didn’t know what was wrong with me and to just go home and have a poo.
and grab it before you lose your balance,
Of course, “later” is a rather relative term. You hear this shout-out at every break in the music. You start eliminating all breaks between songs via visual cues amongst the band. You slow down the tempo a bit so the set isn’t over too quickly.
For reporting the exploitation of children, such as child pornography. Parents and others concerned with child safety can call this number to report suspicious or illegal Internet activity online. Operated by the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC).
Torn fresh basil leaves
1 tsp dried thyme
It seems so far fetched, but what do I have to lose right now? I am so low and alone and yes I can admit that I am constantly searching for Mr Right and falling deeper into my empty hole
The aim of the “International Conference on Innovation and Development” (3-5 June, 2012) is to take stock of the relevance of the work of Austrian economist Joseph Schumpeter for developing countries. The conference coincides with the centenary of the publication of Schumpeter’s seminal work, The Theory of Economic Development (1911). The conference will be held in conjunction with the annual Innovation for Economic Development executive program.
They finally published their nutritional info after refusing to do so for many years. It’s probably because a standard burrito there with cheese and sour cream weighs in at 970 calories. Even now, they have a very defensive disclaimer on their info insisting that their calories are far better for you.
If the Dragon berths successfully, 1,200 pounds of supplies will be unloaded and SpaceX will start this Fall to fulfill its Commercial Resupply Services (CRS) contract for NASA for at least 12 missions to carry cargo to and from the space station.
A bunch of other things I find out about afterwards or sometimes not at all.
CHILD SEXUAL ABUSE
I’m going to say the same thing about today’s MINI-Reggie in regards to my blog. Now, I’m not saying she’s a Mini-Reggie to make light of her blog or anything she does. I’m only saying so because I get the sense that her blog is in flux. So, I think when you go to this Mini-Reggie’s site, you should leave her a comment and tell her who YOU are. I suggest this particular action because this particular blogger has made MY site better. Honestly, every time she comments, she brightens my day. She is a beacon of warmth and humanity and she lives in beautiful India. And if she blesses your blog by stopping by and leaving a comment, you’ll understand exactly why the places she stops become just a little bit brighter.
“What color is he?”
I may be becoming a bit obsessive – but there are worse things I could be obsessing over. I’ve always been an emotional eater – and the past two weeks I could have very easily net me about 10# weight gain on the scale. The fact that I am choosing a work-out over food fulfillment is saying something. Plus, I’m paranoid that the ONE day I don’t feel like doing it…is going to be the beginning of me gaining ALLLL my weight back. And I’m NOT having that!
So a BIG, BIG Thankyou to everyone who entered the challenge, and remember to please “POP” on back tomorrow for the start of the next Challenge, hosted by the the Lovely Flower Guru , KATHY!!!
win a prize kindly donated by
What about the ‘village-fool’ remark that the Chief Secretary to the Government Sidek Hassan made in response to the AG’s Report?
Or it could simply be that I'd gone mad, which happens from time to time.
Stewards - one of whom was a local Christian clergyman - politely asked visitors to identify themselves - but also asked anti-racist campaigners to keep out to avoid inflaming tensions.
My husband’s parents have been a huge help this time around. Without them I don’t know what we would have done. Three years ago I really started thinking I was going to die. If the disease didn’t kill me, the meds would. That same year, because of cancer I buried two people I loved dearly. It makes you face your mortality. I became sad and depressed, afraid I would be dead soon, too. I had things I wanted. Things I needed to know would be taken care of if I did die soon. My boys are still children. They still need taking care of. So I started planning and making people promise me certain things. I needed assurance that if I died within months everything would be okay. And in my defense, I am not the only one who thought I wouldn’t still be here today, we ALL thought it. We all thought I only had months left.
I altered the chipboard embellishment by slicing off the bottom part with my craft knife. I then added some Tim Holtz Picket Fence Crackle Paint and once it was dry sponged over some Vintage Photo distress ink.
They judge their people with the contradictory (manmade) laws which conflict and clash with the Islamic laws, which were the origin of their honour and pride and in which was their peace and steadfastness. Allah (swt) said:
I thought I was going to grab my bag, get of the house and run forever.
One day my mother was searching frantically for me, I was around 10-11 years old , I finally heard her calling ... I was down the road at the neighbours house, riding his horse, bareback, in the paddock.
I have such days quite often. Although I have no list of “favourite artists/songs” there are seasons where I am just stuck..
And here it is, all sewn and pressed. The bottoms of the fronts want to curl under a little. Perhaps when I wear it, it won't be a problem. I have only made one previous jacket with this version of this pattern - the red wool with the black embroidery - and it doesn't have this problem. But the red wool is more substantial and heavier. I know I always have this problem with the square bottomed version of this pattern.
Anyway! It's Queen's night tomorrow, I'll be heading out with Ruiter for a big party. We were out last week when he got a call from someone saying they were from the "Organization of the desperate pigs". He thought it was a joke at first, but it turns out that they want him to do an infographic with their data on how the welfare of farmed pigs have improved over the last decades. Ruiter says he's too damn busy, but I told him I'd help him with it, if he'd do the consulting. I'm going to try and push for it. It'll be nice to 'get out there'.
My dear daughter had two bowls even though earlier
The other thing that keeps breaking is my groin. Not the fun bit, that's fine judging by the amount of times my wife requests that I 'stop poking that sodding thing in my back you twat' most mornings. Romance is alive and well at Gumph towers. No it's the sodding muscle, which despite my warm up ritual, keeps pulling when I play squash. Sore and very annoying.
But when you get down to the root of it, the base cause and source of the problems with the PLCB is that it reeks of the patronizing attitude of do-gooders. We, the itty-bitty wittle citizens of the Commonwealth, just can't handle our liquor -- or wine -- so the State has to do that for us.
Pulitzer Prize winner Michael Chabon (who’s always had a thing for Martian scifi) co-wrote the screenplay. It’s his first film credit since 2004’s Spider-Man 2, the former high mark for superhero excellence (pre-The Dark Knight, of course). Readers of Thrilling Tales (the retro-pulp issue of McSweeney’s that Chabon edited back in 2003) know the first chapter of his sadly unfilmed screenplay “The Martian Agent, A Planetary Romance.” Chabon told me he has no intentions of completing the novelization, so his John Carter revisions are the closest we’re going to get.
I always been a fan of music, just listening to tons of wonderful music I just started playing, creating my own tones.
tablespoon of water.
These opinions that are emerging are voices of Torontonians, with just cause. A Casino coming to anyone’s backyard is a huge decision that has a never-ending multitude of interests to represent.
Even your walking is so pretty
Best Baby Jogger 87104CONSOL City Mini – Green-Gray w Parent Console Collections
Emma (no pause, no thought)- "I don't know, I am not a paleontologist. If I was a paleontologist, I would know about bones."
While Autumn hasn't officially started yet,our mountain town has started to experience the cooler air, and the Aspens have begun to turn color.Yesterday, I craved something warm and comforting, so I whipped up an old favorite; Chana Masala.
Is this somewhere to relax or somewhere to entertain?
credit: kotaku.com
“I worry that life becomes reduced down to theological statements or an obsession with the Christian subculture. I worry that when I read some blogs it’s almost like the author is wearing their ‘Chrsitian’ hat and afraid to admit to their audience that they love things like the Inbetweeners and Glee.”
"Blue Skies" Felt by MFT
Today I'm working on morning work for next week. We're doing a grammar review each day next week, so look for more of these coming up in the next few days.
In the other example in the past tense the person counted four donkeys, does that mean at present there are four donkeys, no the past and present are different.
- Crystal Gardens by Amanda Quick
Inspired by one of my Flickr contacts, Henna Bee, who does such gorgeous henna (You just have to check out her photos, they are amazing) I decided to have a go myself. I had big and small hands to practice on, including my five year old daughter who had been waiting patiently ever since she saw the henna tube arrive from the Halal butchers in Wellington (yes, our halal butcher doesn't just sell meat!)
That's it for me today...hopefully our journey home from Cali is smooth and I will be home and in my bed by midnight! Have a great week!
swatched all together in same order as above:
Rare 1975 album on the Coco Records label, with two guitars, congas, timbales, moog, mellotron, clavinet, electric piano, etc.(Vinyl Rip)
You’ll notice many of them really are in fact safe to consume (i.e. Ascorbic Acid, or Vitamin C), but there are still hundreds of others that most certainly aren’t. As my mother says, if you can’t say or spell it you probably shouldn’t be eating it.
Do you agree or disagree with Ray’s list? Who have we missed out? Let us know by posting your comments below.
A few weeks later, a couple from the local Haitian church here in Michigan came to visit us in Haiti. I brought them to see Madam Maxo, so they could share with the donor where her money went. I told them not to mention the money, but just to say we were there to visit. During the visit, Madam Maxo was asked how she was getting by with her husband gone. Here is her answer... “ It is very hard. I am struggling to provide for my family. But, God did an amazing thing and provided a miracle in my life. He provided for us in a way I did not expect, so I took the money and started a market. Now I am able to provide for my family from the money I make selling things.”
AND then my childhood started all over again when I became a mother.... seeing the world through a child's eye is amazing. I'm not even sure where half the stuff I came up with came from....
And speaking of lovely and talented, our dealer pal and frequent show neighbor Diane Passi is hosting a TENT SALE this Sunday, October 23, from 10 to 4, at her place in Wheaton, Illinois, 841 Delles:
First try, open scheduled transactions, nothing happens. After a minute, I hit a couple of mouse clicks and the whole Quicken crashes. Grrr, Argh, as Josh Whedon would say, and one of my favorite sayings when working with computers – which my husband fondly reminds me that “computers are our friends!”. Second try, same thing, crashes Quicken. Reboot the whole system. Third try, open Quicken, open scheduled transactions, nothing happens, wait longer, hit the mouse, crash Quicken!!!! GRRRR ARGH. Now I call out for help, “Honey!” Ok, it wasn’t much of a call as he was sitting right next to me at his computer but he did come up and walk over to see what was happening.
It was so freaky that I had to call my mom and ask her why this was happening to me! I needed to be pinched, pretty hard. I also had to take a picture of the book and Tweet it off to R.L. Stine. He was nice enough to respond, Tweeting:
If you'd like to do this instruction, just gather up all your fav patterns and say the rhyme to pick one.
3 closer
Have a plan already. You are just guessing and putting yourself through unnecessary stress if you don’t. You are taking a test without studying.
Symbolic gestures & rituals:
- In a long run they will collapse in Spiritual burn out.
Hi folks, I'm back again with another challenge card to share with you all! Today's card is inspired by Moxie Fab World's Tuesday Trigger - Beads and Baubles. Here's the inspiration photo ...
I can't yet comment on the books following From Russia, with Love, but if those first five are anything to go by, it's a safe bet that Bond will continue to be beguiled by the birds and frequently determine to down tools and take whichever lass he's besotted with in that particular book off to live in a farmhouse in the country and raise chickens/goats/pigs/children. There's a pattern of behaviour established for 007, one which doesn't really tally with the idea of him being a sexist pig – at least no more than countless other characters – and indeed real live actual men – from the same era.
Gillette $5/both razor and cartridge pack; ProGlide Styler, Proglide or Venus @ Target
Some fun facts about me:
There are things in life that just warm my heart - the return of pumpkin spice lattes at Starbucks that marks the beginning of fall (at least for me!), cupcakes with really thick buttercream frosting, denim that fits perfectly, English bulldogs, and a good bromance.
-Pour the gravy over the chicken evenly all over and cook again till 25-30 minutes in the oven at the same temperature uncovered.If you want gravy,then reduce the cooking time.or else you get the dry version of stuffed chicken.
“If, as we expect, future research replicates the finding that fatherless parenting fosters greater gender flexibility in boys, this represents a potential benefit. Research implies that adults with androgynous gender traits may enjoy social psychological advantages over more gender traditional peers.”
I thought it’s about ignoring our heart and emotions.
planned, but I know what I have planned...
Cause he did not want
The X Factor judge, 23, who recently released her first solo single, tops the annual FHM list.
M13: 10:08
- Blueberries 1 ping clamshell $2.98 each (Chile)
Welcome back to my page, you awesome people! I am honored that you would wish to come back to this corner of the blogosphere to see what I have in store.
Robert Ryman’s mature works are achievements of endurance. Since the mid-fifties, he has slowly experimented with painting directed outside the bounds of illusionistic depiction, countering Ab Ex tenets of push-pull composition, atmospheric effect, and virtual space. Ryman’s more literal practice of stressing materials as materials has continued to the present. This fall, the Art Institute of Chicago and the Rhona Hoffman gallery offered a look at classic Ryman works which emphasize the painting’s support, the canvas or “stage” on which things happen rather than the place which depicted events appear to be happening. Ryman did not just magically conjure such achievements, however, and his current Arts Club exhibition takes us through his journey to maturity through 28 works on paper from 1957 to 1966.
Children’s stories have been part of the cultural heritage of all nations. A Norse tale, Sister Bear ($17.99, Marshall Cavendish Children) as retold by Jane Yolen and beautifully illustrated by Linda Graves is the story of Halva who finds a bear cub alone in the woods and brings her home to raise. Sister Bear becomes part of the family and saves Halva from some terrible trolls at one point. Ideal for ages 5 through 8. For a slightly young set, there’s Creepy Monsters, Sleepy Monsters ($14.99, Candlewick Press) about two like human kids go to school, play outside, take a bath, and finally settle down to sleep. It’s a cute and clever way to debunk fears. For the same ages comes The Cave Monster by Thomas and Peter Weck ($15.95, Lima Bear Press) When Joe Bean, Lima Bear’s cousin, has been captured by the Cave Monster, Lima must rescue him from the Black Cave. It has a happy ending and a lesson about facing up to one’s fears.
The upper cabinets had to go in first. Hubby built what is called a “dead man”—essentially a pair of 2x4’s in a T formation to prop under the bottom edge of a cabinet while attaching the cabinet to the wall. Hubby also installed a temporary leveling board on the first wall to aid in the process.
Once you’ve watched a video about how recycling works, you may want some recycling books to use in your classroom. There are tons of titles out there – check these out at your local library to help students investigate recycling in more depth.
If you like wine even a little, go check them out. Their tasting room is open from 4pm-7pm on Friday evenings. Michael is passionate about his wine, he is a local producer, and he has great stories about all the work he has put into the vineyard (including the 60,000 prunings he recently made...by hand).
2. The second way is to just read it in the text.
After walking, stumbling and barging my way over the mud for about half a mile I found firmer ground and I set off again on a path I knew would take me back to the hardpack bridleways I’d followed on the way out. I just about made it back to the hardpack; the thin cyclocross tyres had clogged with thick, Gower mud, as had the brakes and the three-quarter length mudguards I’d left on the bike. All thus made it very hard to get moving even up the mildest incline.
Overall this was a great paranormal novel with real characters and an intriguing story. At the end, I found myself wanting to spend more time with these characters and find out more about their remarkable lives. A great read!
Results for Great Barr with Yew Tree in 2011:
Ashley is taking Suzanne and Sonja shopping after school! They are pretty excited about that. I talked to my Benjamin yesterday. He is such a good kid. He is happy. He is in Afghanistan, it was 93 degrees and humid, and he is happy. He is happy because he knows he has a good life, and a good wife. He gets to talk to Ashley each night at this place he is right now, and that really helps him. He knows she is so good and faithful and that she loves him, so that really helps him. It also helps that besides dealing with heat and going on patrol with 60+ pounds of gear, things have been relatively calm where he is right now.
"Do you still love me?"
Craftsman style began in California and quickly became the preferred style for small homes across the country until about 1930. Small Craftsman homes are usually called Bungalows and are characterized by low-pitched gabled roofs with wide overhangs. Details such as beams and brackets are very common. A Craftsman home has a "hand-crafted" look that continues throughout the interior.
is now refusing to pay for entirely spurious reasons. When the property
*Only open to US Residents (sorry).
Throughout the experience I learned some things. First of all, we weren’t nearly as prepared as I thought we were, simply because things were scattered all over. We (don’t you love how I take credit for things) had already hooked up the other small generator to the Traeger BBQ which requires electricity to run. That’s when, to our dismay, we learned that the heating element had gone out. Tim had to round up one of the propane camping stoves and some propane. This took awhile because the stove was out in the 5th wheel trailer and the propane was in the barn, and of course it was dark, cold, and raining. I realized we need to have a place where things are kept together and that is conveniently located.
All of a sudden I lost control
The materials I used for this card are:-
When in power, Tweeddale was relatively sympathetic towards his former moderate presbyterian brethren, but he had no sympathy for the radical platform espoused by the Societies. He sat in the Scottish parliaments of 1681, 1685 and 1686, which were all declared illegitimate by Societies, and he also sat on the Privy Council when it introduced the Abjuration oath against the Societies in December 1684 and proclaimed James VII as king of Scots in February 1685. (Wodrow, History, IV, 160n, 202n.)
Given my perchance for urinating in inconvenient moments that had plagued me throughout this pregnancy, I quite honestly thought I had left it a little to long and had fully wet myself this time. Being completely embarrassed I continued on my path to the bathroom unnoticed by the group.
Paul Weston
Matlin's statement was more than a little hypocritical. The IBO makes a reasonable case that most of the direct subsidies go to the arena, as the other subsidies would be as-of-right.
Actress, “Titanic”, BD 5/11/1952
Life is full of possibilities. Endless possibilities.
Sadly, the vast majority of sixties cover versions of Beatles tracks were somewhat pedestrian cash-ins. A favoured trick amongst record companies of the time was to issue Beatles album tracks as singles. You would simply put a band in the studio you'd been waiting awhile to break, give them a relatively new Beatles tune, and get them to bang it out quickly in the hope that it would be a hit, and their careers would be launched.
or dead to the call
And wet with all the showers.
Collapsonomics depresses me! I know that the world cannot continue in the way it is now and things must change, but to me collapsonomics isn’t very positive and is also very male dominated. I was discussing this with Vinay yesterday over coffee and he seemed to agree with where I was coming from which was so very refreshing for me as I have found myself in a dominated position in this environment for too long; that somehow my opinion for a future didn’t matter as the foundations for the future are being laid by men – Dark Mountain project was started by men, Truth and Beauty is run by men, and a lot of the movers and shakers are men. I have declared myself as a particularly rubbish feminist, but I don’t think feminism is my point here; it’s equality that is.
While I wouldn’t belittle myself so much as to say I’m the definition of ugly - although the mirror on a Sunday morning might disagree - I’m definitely more ‘plain Jane’ than Jane Birkin.
Praying for Your Pastor
And your sorrows merely be shadows that fade,
230pm the family representatives from the boy's side will come to Mak isah house to bring 9 'dulang' (trays) of decorative items plus the gold ring for the girl who he is going to be engaged to.
it didn't hurt. I was surprised, because I have such sensitive skin. It was cool to watch him create this image on my arm in all of the colors of the sunset of the night before, when I had said to someone in camp, only half joking, "wherever Sparky is, I hope he's watching this sunset". He must have been. The knives showed the glint of steel and the patina of age and use, just like the real ones. It didn't take that long (or I was too absorbed to notice the passing of time) until it was over. i couldn't stop smiling, i loved it so much.
Thankfully, I'm getting some stress relief, and relaxation on the weekends; post about that to follow soon.
Title: FIXING SHELBY
“Oh, that’s because most men who go to Heaven get there by a close shave.”
-K
20. Thee Headcoatees - Hurt Me
To my surprise, Shane and Cathy were discussing sexual techniques and methodologies as this all went down. It was surreal to say the least.
After writing this post, I went to one of the large bridal stores online, don't waste your time unless you do not really care about a nice garter, they were really really sad and very boring.
My husband who is absolutely the sweetest person I have ever known had not heard from her since. She had shown no concern for his health at all. Being the person that he is he sent her a beautiful Mother's Day edible arrangement. When he texted her today to see if she got it. He just got a nasty response and he found out that she actually had refused his gift. Can you imagine?
Lutein and other carotenoids are considered important because of their antioxidant properties. Antioxidants help to protect cells from damage caused by free radicals, the destructive fragments of oxygen produced as a byproduct during normal metabolic processes. As free radicals travel through the body, they cause damage to cells and genes by stealing electrons from other molecules—a process referred to as oxidation.
Our political revolutions will not succeed unless they are accompanied by revolutions of thought — social, sexual, and cultural revolutions that topple the Mubaraks in our minds as well as our bedrooms.
Certainly yes.
33. Caffeine directly affects the neurotransmitters involved with memory and learning, decreasing mental acuity and causing brain fog.
Evenly fill the muffin cups with the batter by following the colour scheme. You can use different piping bags for different colours or you can spoon the batter in the muffin cups. Bake for about 17-20 minutes or just until set and a toothpick inserted into a cupcake comes out clean. Always check a few minutes before the stated baking time. Do not overbake or the cupcakes will be dry.
Onto less mushy news, my birthday is coming up really soon! I'm turning 25 on May 28th, and I'm stoked. I love my birthday. I have no idea what I'm going to be doing, but who cares? I'm sure I'll go out to eat and have a few drinks and it'll be fun. Stephen told me last night that he got the first part of my present, so that's awesome.
Skeptos - This large island and it's neighbours are home to a trading / piratical nation of Minotaurs. They're pretty terrifying sailors. (I realised the other day that this is from Dragonlance. Deal with it :p)
He just turned twelve. In fact, we had his party yesterday.
who ended up killing their chick.
Let me tell you something, 42.2 kilometers looks a hell of a lot longer than 26.2 miles. This will also be the first marathon I'm running that doesn't have any loops or out and backs, it is a straight 26.2 mile run through the city of Madrid and that.is.awesome.
All this is to say, when I get a note from God about failure, I felt like groaning, pissed off. I hated it because it seemed to imply that there is a silver lining. The quote felt like platitudes and spins and twists. Devoid of compassion. Because certainly failure on a math test is different than losing everyone, everything, everywhere in your life from booze...so which failure does this apply to?
Too much of this from politics
I have to wonder if he (like many others) had some weird premonition of his early fate, when he was writing it:
or something like that:
I desaturated the photo a bit
D: "Banana with a bruise on it and it's all brown and mushy and so it's only good for making banana bread with!" (gales of laughter ensue.)
The Lib Dems dream of permanent jobs in the Lords with all those rich expense accounts and ego stroking publicity. The are convinced that STV will deliver them pork on a substantial scale that will make their surrender to the reality of government worth while.
Please say it aloud or in your mind. Repeat it three times as you put your hands together in a prayer position. Please offer your sincere prayer.
She’s been diagnosed with inflammatory breast cancer, which is a rare, more aggressive form of cancer that is not easily detectable by routine mammograms. The type of cancer she has is protein-based rather than hormone-based, which is rarer still.
-On 12.29.11 you got sick for the first time. You woke up with a stuffy nose that went for about a week. You had lots of congestion and a cough which the doctor decided was just a cold. You were pitiful and kept us on our toes as we tried to keep you comfortable.
Marcel Duchamp was the initiator of the exhibition, the one in which 32 people represented the 32 pieces of the chess game, and was also a unique example of the confluence in the collective imaginationary co creative spheres of the gathering of chess, of Cassia, or Venus-Sophia meeting art and surrealism. The premise on the brochure of the show was as follows.
3. finding Our Family- http://jakeandterriadopt.blogspot.com/- I picked Jake and Teri’s blog because I loved their wonderful story about there quest to adopt and build their family…
The teenager, who cannot be identified, refused to have sex with one of the men who then turned on her.
Now have a closer look at your bowlful of stuff. Will it fit into your shallow casserole dish or pie plate for baking? If it looks like too much, then scoop some into a storage container to freeze for next time. If it's not enough, add another grated zucchini, or some frozen spinach or frozen peas or something.
(well, actually i said it the next day when I was puking the contents of my sore and empty stomach into the toilet on the first floor – but … semantics).
All of the photos are in the album, and all organized, I just have to make the layouts.
Jones citing makes it the sixth for spear, I mean TIP tackles (wouldn’t want to use the dreaded S word) in Super Rugby this season.
On the other hand, Samsung’s design allows you to change the battery allowing you to use a spare one to extend battery life or replace an old burnt-out battery with a fresh new one. Oh, and there’s a microSD card slot too. Not that HTC couldn’t have put a card slot into the One X, they just decided that 32GB should be enough for everyone (and it probably is)
Of course, there were a few things I actually had on my list, like a replacement tv stand so that my children don't injure themselves when the old tv stand from 11 years ago finally stops wobbling back and forth & lands on top of them. I love to browse at Target...who doesn't? I walked around the whole store, picking up this shirt, those pants, that cute pair of earrings. Since I work full time, I can justify those purchases. And they were on clearance--a very important fact!
away down under
Postscript: I've added a link to Peter Nelhaus's fine writeup (with lovely screen caps) of Susan Slade. Despite the deliberately provocative title, my main idea in writing this piece was "Hey, these early-1960s films that I love deserve a second look." So if anyone else has a post on some of these, or a similar movie from 1959-1963, post a link in comments by all means and I'll add it here. I'll start by also linking to Peter's post about Strangers When We Meet (b/w Town Without Pity, which also roughly fits our parameters despite the German setting). The Siren forgot about Richard Quine because--well, see banner above. Because of that.
At the mo, Gary is doing a regular feature of Great Writer Links across the web. I had a good read, which inspired a few changes on this blog. Go on have a look, see if you can spot them. No, oh OK I'll tell you then. For a start I've put Miss V to bed. She was useful when the blog started out, but I want to concentrate on the writing now. Anyone who has been around since 2006 knows who I am. I'm not going to publish a book as Verilion, so I'm just going to be me from now on.
By setting the camera on manual or in aperture priority you have the chance to raise or lower the DoF.
BusinessWeek - ‎8 hours ago‎
Released: March 1st (US), March 3rd (UK)
Another great presentation on how community sports providers are meeting the challenges and benefiting from new opportunities created by changes in people’s lives and the economic situation
This is also my fourth full week of math workshop and I love it. The students are always very excited to come to math class and they are working really well independently. Today i was able to pull my first small group with not one interruption! Go Me! Next week I move from place value to estimation, so I'm a little stressed about changing the games within my centers and training the students with them. I wonder how most of you are doing it. Do you always keep the same games within your workshop or do you switch them all when you move on to a new skill? I am thinking I will keep a few and add a few.
Zainab has been detained for three weeks and is due to face a number of charges on Wednesday, including insulting a police officer.
with the fruit she loved and longed for...and from across the sea came little gifts and cheerful letters, seeming to bring breaths of warmth and fragrance from lands that knew no winter.
139 ***5. “The Occasions of Freedom of Speech.” Political Science Reviewer, vol. 5, pp. 383-402 (Fall 1975). (Sources: Items D-III/4/1974 and D-V/29/1975, below, Item A-3, above. Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 199-213 (1992).)
The movie, A Love to Hide, was a very difficult watch, but a most necessary one if you believe, as I do, that we must never forget the atrocities we are capable of performing. I reflected on the Holocaust of the Native Americans, and then the Holocaust of the Jews and Gays, which brought me to the current crop of Republican Presidential candidates in the United States. I wonder if any of them have picked up a history book? Probably safe to say that Bachmann and Perry can’t even spell history.
The key is to use things out of your control for an excuse. Never give the option of personal negligence, and NEVER apologize. Apologies are for the guilty and above all act calm unless you're a good actor and make an entrance where you storm in out of frustration.
I used another digi image by Mo Manning, called Make a Wish.....can I just say how totally addicted I am to Mo's images lately?...LOVE them! The scalloped over is up on foam tape and so is the large DP layer that sits on the card base. Stickles were added to random parts of the image. The sentiment is from an old SU set of mine and that's also up on foam tape. The layout is today's Sweet Sunday Sketch #144.
EDITOR’S NOTE: Steven Cenname is a 19-year old Salisbury University student, majoring in Environmental Studies and Political Science. He is also a musician and has a Minor in Music. He describes himself as a “Social Progressive” and believes that Rep. Andy Harris has failed to provide any benefit to the Eastern Shore constituency he is supposed to represent.
Assistance League of Denver:
♥ Enjoy this cuties ♥
Allrecipes- One of the first online recipe resource, and still one of the best. Recipes are submitted by site members, as well as companies like Kraft and magazines like Taste of Home. There's really nothing you can't find at this site. I use Allrecipes as a source for this blog all the time.
I have a huge herb garden in the front of my house, and a smaller herb garden in the back which is mostly vegetables and flowers. I am always running outside to snip fresh herbs which I don't mind doing since I know it's fresh and gets me out side. But I saw this great DIY project idea to share for those of you who don't have the luxury of a garden like myself.
Journal Prompt:
** From the Book of Common Prayer Order for Holy Communion.
Not many independent reports come out of Yemen, and this was a chance to see a deeper, more human side to a place at the heart of so much turmoil.
We offer understanding not from the perspective of being involved in the situation, but because we are involved with the person.
I took a different approach with this set because I am not one to do
What the FUCK is going on at the BBC?
Here’s a little scene from UNTIL THERE WAS YOU when poor Liam is trying to ensure his daughter’s safety vis-à-vis a certain boy…
The show’s just got started. It’s time for the participants to know the rules in the competition they are going to attend.
-Naive
Now, give me some love and have a beautiful idiot free weekend.
Hi Friends! Here in North Carolina the trees are beginning to bloom and we are gearing up for Spring. As I walked outside this morning to get my daughter loaded in the car for school I glanced over at my vegetable garden. It looks so sad and ready for me to get in there and get to work.
Among pupils at comprehensives, about 58% reach that level.
Now, let's just all have a very loud chuckle....at me and my thoughts.
So let me get this straight: you've established that health care is a right and passed a law that mandates people are responsible to buy a product (insurance) to fill that right so that they don't have to depend on the good, productive people who already buy that product. For people who can't afford it, subsidies up to the full amount are available - paid for by those same people who buy the product. Since a requirement wouldn't mean much without the threat of punishment, the IRS will hire a few thousand agents to enforce citizens buying that product. I read they ordered a boatload of Remington 870 shotguns to help in this.
He loved the rain and the cool breeze. Lying down on his back he watched the drama unfold in the sky.
Therefore, the simplest solution is to not wear your gym clothes out of the facility but instead take them off when you are finished working out. Put them in your gym bag, wash both clothes, and bag as soon as you get home so you are ready for the next session.
I belong to God and trust me when He showers gifts on us, it is not because we have earned them, but because He loves to give good gifts to the ones He adores. So if He blesses you with good gifts, then delight in them and use them to the best of your ability. Why? Because our Gifts are to Glorify Him but most importantly, because He loves us. When you are glorifying Jesus by using your gifts to encourage others it is a blessing. You should leap with joy! Rejoice!
So it has been ages since my last post, but certainly not because there has been nothing to write about. A very busy real ale girl, but my 2010 pledge is a blog every Sunday, perhaps another on a Wednesday if you are lucky.
beside you ….. oh my love come to my side in the real world
Leadership Bonus: Bobby Gujral. $15,653. Not for the year. For the month. Ryan Kendl $6,515. John McGrath. $6,291. Been seeing him race around in some pretty nice cars on Facebook. Nick Lorence. $5,607. He’s more of a poker guy; investing in good tournaments. James Raymond and Mark Nielsen. $4,300 and $4,100 respectively. Josh Olin, Ashlynn Orng, Andrew Aaron, Natalie Wagner and Dan Toshner all were between $3,000 and $4,000. But Toshner got $3,000 in WGB!?! So. You can get like 5 bonuses. Andrew Aaron picked up a $1,250 recruiting bonus. Tiare Hubbard got a $2,287 Training Bonus. Get a bunch of them.
I mentioned last week that I was hoping to run this race at between an 8:09 and 8:15 pace. Well, to be honest, after my little adventure on Sunday night I had to adjust my expectations.
14 The Baddies - Colin
Driving through the city
These stamps can be found today at Little Darlings Rubber Stamps. Below please see the blog hop order links. Make sure to visit and comment on each blog for your chance to win some yummy candy from Little Darlings Rubber Stamps. Candy ends on March 20th.
The characters are all memorable and lovable – each had a reason and motivation as to why they were fighting and struggling in this new era. There was no clear lines drawn here as well, even the protagonist, was an assassin for the revolutionary in his previous life.You feel for their goals and you get sucked into their struggle, where it’s a battle of ideas and that it’s unfortunate that one must lose.
Bangers for Matt. Yes, they're hard to find but I lucked out (The Vermont Country Store, I thank you).
This debt we pay to human guile;
Same rules apply. A minute or two of waiting is fine, talking to your spouse for 30 minutes while your child waits, is not.
Baloney is when you tell a 50-year old woman that she looks 18. Blarney is when you ask a woman how old she is, because you want to know at what age women are most beautiful.”
Returning to the resuscitation room, they were cleaning up. I don't know if they pulled it out of the victim or found it in his clothing but there was a bullet in a specimen bag. It was a hollow-point. I'd never actually seen one of these things. Try to visualize a flower, made of metal, with sharp metallic petals radiating from the center. Viewed head on it looked like a .40 caliber Ninja throwing star. It was a viscious looking thing.
And see the splendor of the summer fields,
Akhtar seems to be eagerly looking forward to the upcoming Copyright (Amendment) Bill 2010 (for a discussion on the amendments sought to be introduced, see here), which seeks to provide independent rights to creators of literary and musical works in cinematographic films, entitling them to royalty that was denied to them so far. This Bill, according to him, should address some of the problems that the writers in this country have always faced vis-a-vis their creative rights. He’s also bothered about the perception of lyricists in general, alleging that they seldom get the respect they deserve and their performances have traditionally been judged on a completely wrong set of parameters.
Once we cleared that up, we can imagine what would happen when we narrow all this knowledge provided by Wikipedia to strictly linguistic issues. Imagine a place intended for a specialist audience, created by academic linguists with articles that can be edited freely by any registered linguist.
Happy Wednesday Evening
When they left was there reason or rhyme?
Villages are not built overnight.
NHK, TBS and TV Tokyo usually don’t disclose the ratings for their shows on a regular basis, therefore they won’t be included in the list below. Certain dramas or drama specials that aired on those channels and might lack ratings are still included with a ??.?% rating. This doesn’t mean that the ratings were too low to recorded.
She looked at it.
Firing flame weapons
And the US is not top in every category. It’s an interesting and different approach deliverng a ranking which presumably will not change very much over time. I wonder though if national governments will react to it.
My main issue with publishing was that everyone I knew liked my work but whenever I submitted it to publishers they described it as sub-par at best. That was so mentally debilitating you would not believe. I kept thinking to myself, “If my friends love it why do publishers hate it?” – Paranoia to say the least. Were my friends giving me false praise?
Speaking shortly after the State Opening of Parliament, Mr Llwyd said:
"Excellent choice," you smiled back while you got the glasses ready.
The creaminess carried over into the next course, an asparagus risotto. The risotto was in a sort of broth and felt more like a soup than a risotto (not that I minded!). The asparagus was quite fresh and came through in almost every bite.
- a set of Btssb wristcuffs (i think I've started an addiction to wrist cuffs now...)
My beautiful Zero teapot, which reminds me of a stout penguin
We have reached the end.
The order also castigates Bayer for adopting a "two faced" stand before the tribunal. Bayer argued that since Cipla sells cheaper generic versions in the market (at Rs 30,000 per monthly dose of Sorefanib), there was no need for a compulsory license. The controller rightly dismissed this argument, since Bayer had challenged Cipla's right to sell the generic version in the market through a patent infringement law suit, and was now relying on this alleged illegality to ward off a compulsory licensing order.
Readings: Acts 8: 26-40 and John 15:1-8
In May 1948, RAND was incorporated as a not-for-profit entity independent of Douglas, but it continued to receive the bulk of its funding from the Air Force. The think tank did, however, begin to accept extensive support from the Ford Foundation, marking it as a quintessential member of the American establishment.
And guess what? I'm going on a business trip in a couple days. I am really excited about it!
By 2005, Thurman was commanding a salary of $12.5 million per film. Her first film of the year was Be Cool, the sequel to 1995′s Get Shorty, which reunited her with her Pulp Fiction cast mate John Travolta. In the film, she played the widow of a deceased music business executive.
Feel-good, fun & cute!
In my previous body of work which was the result of a residency in a Malaysian garden estate in 2006 and toured back to Malaysia and Singapore in 2008, I included all kinds of embroidered and lace motifs – animals, people, houses, boats etc., as the works were more 2 dimensional and mostly monochrome and the reference to other
One proven method involves subliminally suggesting that if you buy a given product, you will magically inherit the traits of the people in the commercial. Using the right shampoo will make your hair look luxurious and full of body, and if you read the subliminal messages, it will also take care of that crooked nose, unsightly warts and as an added bonus, you’ll shed those 35 extra pounds you’ve been carting around since the late 90′s. For obvious legal reasons, no shampoo manufacturer is going to actually promise you much of anything beyond clean hair. Still, the models in their ads never have crooked noses, warts or thunder thighs. A coincidence? I think not.
Then I went to the cinema, because big pictures and loud sounds are welcome at those times.
I hope those of you who got the right answers but didn't win won't be too upset! Next contest will be MUCH easier! So come back next time to enter.
(973) 285-5555
Pink Cardigan - Zara
Once known as the harsh conditions provided little more than happy to start screaming since Oklahoma had won 19 times during the tulsa oklahoma zoo of July to enjoy and world famous tourist attractions to visit. Some of these casinos, Oklahoma casinos offer easy gambling access to both civil and criminal cases information via a convenient search form. Information provided includes the tulsa oklahoma houses of the lumber tulsa oklahoma in donations to coach Gary Pinkel's Missouri's football program that will pay off down the road.
40th anniversary of Nkrumah’s death marked today. Osagyefo Dr. Kwame Nkrumah (1909-1972) first President of Ghana, foremost proponent of Pan-Africanism in the latter half of the 20th century.
Stephanie is like
‘Gone.’ Ollie was stunned into monosyllables.
God has called us by name and also God sends us. But we are equipped by the Power of the Holy Spirit and we are equipped by the fellowship and love that we have for each other.
We even have some of the "wonders" of nature right here in our empty, temperature-controlled abode. I caught a few spiders and other creepy-crawlies before we moved out our stuff, but now they've returned with reinforcements...and their extended families. Awesome.
Two weeks ago, Amazon issued a press release charting KDP Select's performance during its first month. KDP Select books were borrowed 295,000 times in December, with authors earning $1.70 per borrow. Total earnings for the top ten authors exceeded $70,000. The press release features four authors who each earned four figures.
If you’d like to check in with a couple other bloggers working to get fit, you can visit their weekly posts here:
and created from basic ingredients.
During this frenzy, a touch of wildness has entered the play of Polly and Pip. While they have always enjoyed tracking back and forth along the straight-line that runs from their bedroom through the dining room and into the living room couch, now each run ends with an airborne child crashing face first into pillows and cushions. In addition, they have started adding odd sound effects to their lives: grunts, buzzes, and growls fill any quiet moment at the dinner table, in the bathroom, or outside playing. Stomping across the creaky hardwood floors of our apartment has also become a regular form of entertainment. One day last week they pulled out every doll and stuffed animal they possess, piled them on the floor in their bedroom, and proceeded to slide, crash, stomp, and jump on the pile.
George Anastaplo
"Uh, no. Not okay."
2. You said that Mr. Saba has $85 million that he is going to be leaving me; after further research I found that his net worth was actually $2.1 billion when he died, not $85 million. Where is the rest of the money? Are you planning on stealing it and buying a mini island for your collection of chickens who didn’t cross the road? Judging from how professional you are, I pray that’s not the case and there is a reason you’re only planning on leaving me a fraction of the wealth.
I have made numerous cards in the past for my colleague and those for his partner always have to incorporate a butterfly as she has a soft spot for them.
Over 2/3 of the people responded with "buying the wrong size". This is not the reason why there are orphans in your closet. No, the reasons why you have clothes in your closet that you do not wear is because of the wrong style.
He and his family are believed to have set up a global business empire across eight countries and are allegedly worth several billions of ringgit, according to the list released by the BMF on Feb 21.
Place stock in a microwave-safe container and heat on high for one minute. Gently crumble saffron into warm stock and stir to dissolve. Set aside.
Well, another batch is in the fermenter. I had 3 folks stop by to enjoy some beers during the brew. One of them was from New York.
The truth could reveal a deadly secret as old as the Eternal Guardians themselves.
OPPORTUNITIES for volunteering are endless. Won’t you please take a few moments today to contact Leila Boyer to discuss your ideas, your desires and your availability? We’ll be glad you did, and we’re sure that you will be, too! Leila can be reached at 410.535.2452 or cchsadmin@calverthistory.org. If you’d like to stop by Linden and talk with her, please call ahead of time to make sure she’ll be in the office!
When the female Israeli sales rep went to get some food later on she was surrounded by angry youths who starting harassing her.
I have been away. So long! I didn't get a chance until now to mention that I have three poems in the spring issue of Menacing Hedge: 'Snow Globe Shepherd,' 'Village' and 'Crepe Paper Body.' Like the label on the bottle in Alice in Wonderland might as well have said, "Read Me."
Your Heart Out is a website that gives you information about the cool things in Utah. They seem to be feature mostly Provo and Salt Lake establishments, but often highlight stores in Davis County, or even St. George. They review restaurants, advertise locals that have shops on etsy, and point you in the direction of some fun places to shop. Check them out!
(Reprise last verse.)
The taste truly mirrored the aromatics, as a smooth and semi-sweet malt base introduced the beer, and led to a fig-flavored center. There was enough carbonation to lift away the heavier flavors in the finish, leaving a dry and cleaner-than-expected aftertaste. Yeast and spice were downplayed somewhat, perhaps due to the aging, but there was still a balancing hop bitterness present. Even though the bouquet seemed to belie a cutting alcohol taste, it was actually not that noticeable, which I rather liked.
Place mushrooms, garlic, and onion in a food processor. Pulse until the mixture is finely ground. In a large skillet, melt the butter and cook the mushroom mixture until very soft, about 5-7 minutes over medium heat. Transfer the mixture into a large bowl, add the refried black beans, ground turkey, salt, and pepper, and mix all together until very well combined.
Jumper - H&M, shirt - Gharani Strok via T.K.Maxx, skirt - charity shop (originally Topshop), ring - Topshop, shoes - Primark, nails - 17 Forever with Barry M Blueberry.
Original Air Date: Mar 8, 2012
I would definitely repeat this recipe because it's so delicious, and it cooks while I'm at work. This is a perfect meal for those cold nights in front of the TV watching football. Serve it with sliced avocado, celery, crackers, or whatever you fancy.
The stainable Minwax wood filler was much much better. I bought a putty knife (finally), and went through the entire container in one night. It doesn’t dry as fast as the high-performance (4-6 hrs vs. 20 minutes), but you don’t have to do any mixing, and it doesn’t stick to your tools that much (60 grit sandpaper can clean off your tools).
Big took the glass and her elbow, then led Tina from the room. Felicon Whisper poured again from the chilled carafe and leaned back while a fog enveloped his spinning brain.
Lorelai: Mommy, we could play pretend. You'll be the queen.
I will be collecting all comments and statements from people that could or have damaged the party.
Always... I remember that I have so much more than lots and that I need to be thankful for that.
Religious progressives, on the other hand, are drawn less by hope of heaven and fear of hell than by the appeal of the sacred community, and the teachings of religion to love their neighbors as themselves. They tend to be more open to new ideas, new kinds of leaders, and new ways of thinking about faith; and much less inclined toward thinking there is one true path.
It's a twisted logic but the train of thought goes along the lines that any craftsman, in this case, a carpenter or a butcher, who loses a digit whilst plying their trade is actually going to be more skillful and thorough. Because having paid the ultimate sacrifice, you can be sure that the care and attention that they put into their work, is going to be of a far higher standard. Far higher than your average Joe, who would probably prefer to keep their phalanges intact in the first place. Which does makes sense. Albeit in a very macabre, perverse way.
Pershing sat hard in the wooden seat and tried not to notice the stuffed upholstery on the main floor below. Sometimes the kids would rain popcorn and soda pop on the white people. At last, the place went dark, and Pershing left Monroe. He was on a bright veranda with Myrna Loy and Tyrone Power out in California. It was a perfect world, and he could see himself in it.
Op dit moment zit Laura 16 uur in het vliegtuig naar Frankfurt. Van daaruit neemt ze de trein naar Aken, waar we haar rond 9.30 uur zullen afhalen. Ik ben zo blij dat ze terug is, maar ik weet dat ze Mexico en Costa Rica zal missen!
When I saw the beautiful projects by the Girl Fridays, I was overwhelmed. WOW! They did a fabulous job using ribbon in so many ways. I knew exactly what I wanted to do with ribbon for my card. Last year, for Christmas, I made my sister a mini album capturing the first few days with her daughter in China and at home. I used a ribbon flower technique that I had seen on Laurie's blog here. Excuse the poor image since the actual flower is out of focus.
In general, I'm pretty sure I'm a girly girl.
This worked so well that in 1950 the US Air Force commissioned and funded similar research on the Korean population. Wilbur Schramm, the founding father of the mass communication paradigm, John Ridley and Fredericks Williams were given the mission of interviewing anti-communist refugees to draw up a suitable propaganda strategy on Korea. The study also resulted in the establishment of the “Public Opinion Quarterly” (POQ), the official magazine of “psychological warfare” community.
Thanks for reading and sharing my bandaversary with me. I’m so grateful every day to have found this community. The mentors and the newbies alike, I learn something from each of you and it’s helped me in one way or another on this path.
Date: April 29, 2012
First I removed the butterflies from eachother so that I first cut the thick substrate.
'I'm not sur...whap...and we are off and running again.
As an Ultrarunner and lifelong veteran of living in climates with “interesting” weather, the old Norwegian saying, “there is no bad weather, just bad clothing,” is a good saying to pin to your hat, whether you believe it or not. At least it helps you to feel empowered that you can do something to accommodate any harsh conditions thrown your way by Thor and his minions.
-option to choose a pick up zone, this is only available on 6 month commitment for sketch club
Taro farmers. Lorraine and her husband now grow bananas (btw did you know that bananas are an herb, not a fruit) and coconuts along with several other things.
So far, so on course for my 4-hour cheap veal stock.
Which proves that sex at work is bad,
Tip 1 : It is a long distance from Fox Glacier/Franz Josef Glacier. By the time the bus reaches here, it is about 7 pm (depending on bus operator and their schedules).
Huntley’s claim that he was attacked seven times without police intervention and that race was a factor is not really surprising. I know a number of people who were assaulted at Umbilo police station for complaining to the police about the prostitution in the Glenwood area. They were told to go back to Europe and even beaten. I personally witnessed one such assault on a small white woman. I know that many people in Glenwood of Durban no longer bother to report crimes unless they are claiming insurance as the police do not investigate or appear to even care.
simple ball chain hung from the ceiling. not only does this do the job of providing little bit of privacy, but it sparkled when the light hit it, and looked so chic.
Yet, as far as I am aware, neither English nor French nor Italian has a female form of Jerome, Ronald, Thomas, Peter (although the Germans have Petra!), William, Samuel ...
and am praying for all I need to achieve each one.
Since the topic was announced, I've been on the look out for anniversary beers. Two actually arrived at my door as tasting samples. Another was found in a friend's refrigerator. One was being poured at a local Charlotte beer bar and another was located in a liquor store during a visit to Chicago last month.
I'm not sure I've been able to keep it a secret have I?
She turned towards the hooded man. The car lights shone on the lower half of his face, highlighting his jaw and mouth. A tilt of a smile touched his lips. She needed to taste the blood.
As the brightness of reflected images
New Order Sputnik UK
Praise God in his sanctuary;
In other words, if the ammonia in beef is its biggest flaw, we are in big trouble, since most of us also eat bread and cheese!
There have been interviews with the four editors finding out about
I would like to congratulate you, Mr. Telstra, for training your employees magnificently in the fine arts of contempt and condescension. All three of them had perfected an impeccable phone manner, in which they repeatedly assured me that I would be taken care of, whilst simultaneously clearly implying I was an imbecile.
I know that we can’t go back to the start
I’m not sure what he did, but between the three of us, we somehow got it back up…for two seconds. The wind quickly slammed it down the other way.
At the beginning of the twentieth century the modernist movement set about destroying the form and grammar of traditional art and thus the content, and made it both unintelligible and uninteresting. In the 60’s the New Left became the new "elites". Aristocrat rulers had sense of “noblesse oblige" towards the working classes and a sense of responsibility but the elites, who grew out of the new left, corrupt them out of contempt and personal gain.
Keep riding
This monarchy would appear to be an absolute liability.
As with Smokie this reappears at the start of the new year after falling victim to a good solid wiping. Let's face it, though, this was only ever going to be the second most notable disco Doctorate song of 1976.
My Spirit screamed "No!" to worries and "No!" to making my husband and I react in a negative way. I know better not to have our peace and joy be stolen...No!!! Because He is in our hearts. He is in us!!! That's the truth!!!
Hello Friends and Happy Wednesday! Today we have 'Review Day' at Whimsy Stamps. You can find awesome new inspirational cards using the new April release stamps and dies on the Whimsy blog. Created by the fabulous Whimsy DT! Please click HERE to see them all out
Come on; let’s just be real. These men were great leaders in the Bible and did great things for God and we can’t admit that we like sexual images, or like drinking a few too many or God forbid, swearing. Shit, where did we get things wrong? Where did the honesty go?
Gorilla Tango Girls at No Tell Motel! Adjusting for my given level of Event Time Panic, it was a great night! The girls put on a great show, including Stella as as besotted Indiana Jones. I was nervous about the Wicker Park crowd but they turned out to be a great audience. Fun story: our lovely MC that night, Mark, did a few tricks in between numbers. The last one involved catching a flaming, spiked bowling ball with his head and I remember thinking how glad I was that Diva LaVida was the one to follow that act. If you’ve ever seen her perform, you’d know what I mean. We’re now talking about making another appearance in mid to late June.
Some cooks never find balance--and that's ok with them. They produce food that they're happy with--and that the vast majority of diners would be happy to eat. But if the goal is to get better...to progress...to contribute, then isn't it important to find a sustainable method for mentally and physically producing your craft? If the goal is to be the best, and create great food, then isn't balance the most important ingredient?
He was one of the four black dudes that maintain the gardens in the complex where I’m currently residing. His job is to mow the lawn. A few months ago he complained that he wasn’t coping with this task, so the body corporate purchased one of those fancy industrial lawnmowers - the small tractor-type you can sit on and don’t have to push. The black dude was not too happy with this new fancy machine because it completed the job long before knockoff-time, which meant that a few more odd garden tasks were added to his job-description.
“Out of 27, four or five-year-olds, most have TVs and laptops in their bedrooms, most have sight of or actually own Nintendos, playstation, Xboxes and Wii and many said they watched older brothers, sisters and cousins playing games.”
When in the lobby I saw Yvonne's smiling face.
For our first lesson we have to concentrate on line.
Date: 10th June 2011
Me: Well, we'd have to practice.
Genevieve writes again! (In case some of you are unaware, Settlers of Catan is a board game. I am very good at it. I (very) infrequently lose. The other day, I played with Pete and Gen. Here is Gen’s post about that infamous game.)
“Quam bene vivas refert, non quam diu.” — Seneca
I don't know about you, but Easter has sure snuck up on me this year! I suppose it could be because my mom is no longer here to make plans and remind me. *sigh* But instead of mopping the kitchen floor today, which desperately needs it, I decided to stamp and blog. I had stamped a tree just like this a few years ago for a class and had a few leftover which I thought I'd use... but ended up restamping it so the paper was the right size.
24 snaps
You are after all, on your deathbed.
Great
But, atheists are obliged to deny this.
The stark, broken ribs of a dead ship, illuminated in relief by another diver’s light. Immense lobsters peering from beneath a twisted bulkhead. Tools once used by a steamfitter now long-dead, whose remains are perhaps still here with us. A large dog snapper hiding near Jon and using his light to find and devour prey. Devious bastard. Sleeping parrotfish cocooned in their mucous sacs. And on and on. New visions appearing as previous ones fall behind and out of my cone of visibility, disappearing from my ken. Familiar creatures in an unfamiliar reality.
Bloody good movie. Started to write a review and couldn't get into it, for reasons unknown to me. Lots of things might be said, including comparisons to Sweet Sixteen, Rat Catcher and Winter's Bone, all bloody good themselves and I believe Fish Tank deserves to be counted among them. All I can manage to say beyond this is that the complete lack of sensationalism and the very emotionally challenging committment to character complexity makes Fish Tank a very solid work of realism. I was seriously affected by it, really hit me in the guts. I didn't even recognize Fassbender until my family pointed out to me after the fact that it was the same actor as the guy who played Bobby Sands in Hunger. Monica tells me the guys is rocketing to the A list, got a bunch of splashy product in the can. But he is two for two in my book.
I sometimes become sidetracked by other cerebral things too…vital, hugely significant things, such as the realization that it’s time to increase the serotonin levels in my brain.
Yes,,,,,,,,,Cucumber you have to use cucumber in your daily diet and you should use it over your skin directly.
Wanna link up your story? I would heart it if you would!
The Stooges- 1969
Wherever you go
However, as it always seems to be the case, during the years - junior and high school - when I was becoming more aware, all it seemed that I wanted to do was to fit in. Which meant I felt embarrassed about sitting next to my Asian friends when we were on the subway because we were clique-y. And of course I crushed on the cute popular white guys and wished I was the perky blonde soccer gals they hung out with. I felt self-conscious about speaking Chinese to my parents out loud when we were in public because that was weird. Going outside of the city meant that sometimes we got stared at. I felt strange about going out and eating at Chinese restaurants. Wearing something with a mandarin collar or cherry blossoms or whatever else that could be deemed even vaguely "Oriental." Doing anything that was not absolutely fit-me-in All-American.
Me (fuck) um, actually I hurt my foot really bad, can you fix it with your first aid kit? (he carries one at all times, not kidding)
But you will agree with me when I say it is cruel to say good bye to four sisters in just a handful of hours.
The facts support my source’s assertion. The New York times, for instance, reported in 2009 how the New Jersey company Floorgraphics accused Newscorp of hacking into their password-protected computer systems to obtain proprietary information for an ‘investigative’ news story. The subsequent journalism was described as “utterly false and malicious” by the company, which lost several lucrative contracts as a result.
“I saw that all 11 of my relatives were killed, including my children and grandchildren,” said a weeping Haji Samad, who said he had left his home a day earlier. The walls of the house were blood-splattered. “They (Americans) poured chemicals over their dead bodies and burned them,” Samad told Reuters at the scene. Neighbors said they had awoken to crackling gunfire from American soldiers, who they described as laughing and drunk.
i saw the price and pictured myself with the backpack strapped to my back for 15 hours a day. and then someone stealing it from me.....
so, for all those who stuck through this looooong post - i have a giveaway:
Sam and Sam finished 3rd in their division.
It is not enough to have our earth kundalini energy awakened and integrated (that serpent moves up the body, not down thru it) we must equally have its mate within us too… the suns kundalini.
9. Jan Smuts, statesman (1870–1950)
The letter goes on to say: “As you know, existing federal unemployment benefits are set to expire on November 30th. If this happens, 181,500 Michigan residents will exhaust their unemployment benefits over the next five months.
Ya know what I say to "No embossing," Miz Cathy? I say "No problem!" But wait . . . each and every design I came up with screamed, "EMBOSS ME!" Aaaackk! But alas, I did NOT give in to "embossing" temptation! I followed the rules! Hehehe!! Here's my little "non-embossed" card . . .
Redhook immediately closed the restaurant and cancelled all future tours while OSHA investigates.
Embrace this time of Letting Go!
can’t remember the last time that happened. I’m not sure if I’m losing
I'm tired of being told that Islam is a "Religion of Peace," when every day I can read dozens of stories of Muslim men killing their sisters, wives and daughters for their family "honor"; of Muslims rioting over some slight offense; of Muslims murdering Christian and Jews because they aren't "believers"; of Muslims burning schools for girls; of Muslims stoning teenage rape victims to death for "adultery"; of Muslims mutilating the genitals of little girls; all in the name of Allah, because the Qur'an and Shari'a law tells them to.
So. What say you? Is it important to have both weak and strong female lead characters in our stories? I say yes. You?
And they, frail things had taken panic flight
A pretense of living and breathing, being in his world;
The old man was ancient, but sturdy and he plodded carefully and stiffly down the road. He wore a cream mackintosh, tied tightly in the middle and wide brown slacks. His face was weathered and set and he always sported a blue bobble hat, which he pulled right down to the upper rim of his enormous, brown glasses. His faded dog traipsed wearily alongside him, neither appearing to get any enjoyment from the outing. They walked together in all weather, defying gales and pelting rain in their soggy, windswept partnership.
....I didn't even know who he was...
Combine flour, ground ginger and sugar in a mixing bowl.
This can be up to 10 days intensive support on specific issues such as but not limited to;
4 Rainbow Trout (or any type of trout really)
The wife, who did not see that the idiot had now rolled her son’s photo into a weapon, quickly headed off into the bathroom to take a bath, leaving orders that the idiot was not to leave the bedroom until the culprit….whatever the hell it was….. was D-E-A-D.
At the time I often consider selling them, or giving them to a home that doesn’t mind walking on a carpet of fur (obviously, I never would) – the cat hairs literally get everywhere. It’s like they have a mind of their own, weaving their way into your clothes, almost with a sense of determination. We will not be removed. It’s a never-ending job, clearing up after three cats.
Why I chose this book: See above. But also because I am from Wisconsin and enjoy learning about the history of our fishing communities and immigrant experiences. And also because it's Friday of EARTH WEEK! I love sharing great stories for kids about our natural world.
From early 1940 to 1953, Dr. Lauretta Bender, a highly respected child neuropsychiatrist practicing at Bellevue Hospital in New York City, experimented extensively with electroshock therapy on children who had been diagnosed with “autistic schizophrenia.” In all, it has been reported that Bender administered electroconvulsive therapy to at least 100 children ranging in age from three years old to 12 years, with some reports indicating the total may be twice that number. One source reports that, inclusive of Bender’s work, electroconvulsive treatment was used on more than 500 children at Bellevue Hospital from 1942 to 1956, and then at Creedmoor State Hospital Children’s Service from 1956 to 1969. Bender was a confident and dogmatic woman, who bristled at criticism, oftentimes refused to acknowledge reality even when it stood starkly before her.
There are several factors. According to Fr. Frank Pavone of Priests for Life, pregnancy is a biorhythm (this is not New Age junk science.) Sleep is also a biorhythm. If you wake up in the middle of the night your body tells you to go back to sleep. Similarly many women who abort (an interruption to the biological process of pregnancy) feel the urge to get pregnant again.
holds the land in its fierce embrace.
Of course I agreed to the offer.
No resistance
I was also thrilled to have a chance to visit with my cousins. I am the youngest cousin and even though I live rather close to many of them, I don't have a lot in common with them because of the age difference.
In the prelude of last night’s games, even our good friend @OptaJoe was giving it some: ‘Manchester United have won all 14 of their games against Wigan in all competitions’, and surely, SURELY, they’d make it a round 15.
In 2004, we decided to remodel our bathroom.
Het hart is een die van Sizzix. Hier heb ik Crackle Paint 'Picket Fence' op gedaan. Helaas iets te weinig! :) Je ziet nu het crackle effect niet zo goed.
Destiny: Destined to die young, but her legend will live forever.
All reply: Praise to you, Lord Jesus Christ.
"Just because you have 70 minutes available doesn't mean you have 70 minutes of good music to record. So much of what makes it these days is filler. Raw Power (the Stooges, 1973) is 34 minutes and it's perfect."
Better not to press the matter. Ignoring Dora, he turned and resumed the walk into Vessit. Somehow, it didn't seem likely he'd be able to get Taslin to dress decently now.
Having spent a cheery hour or two in the same pub (The Coach and Horses) and reminisced with the said Jeffrey on a number of occasions when he was unwell, The Hat feels qualified to have posted the same notice of excuse on his own blog these last few weeks. Overcome by unreasonable demands, an attention-seeking cat, threatening calls from robot call centres, temperemental software and an insensitive and uncaring world, (I know you are all nodding), I have felt like one of Donleavy's characters – 'indisposed for all eternity'. So, Mrs Trellis, bear with me..I have new quills and the radiogram is fired up. The Blues are back on the menu.
It’s hard to categorise the genre/style but it’s certainly unique drawing from various electronic sounds filtering in some RnB too.
Then the white guy became a “white Hispanic.”
Like his initial claims in the Maddow interview -- basically, that he's against racial discrimination, but also for allowing businesses to refuse service to whomever they like -- Paul's official response to the firestorm that he's provoked is nothing short of bizarre. It's a blatantly self-contradictory stance being expressed by a (suddenly) national figure (which, come to think of it, isn't all that unusual).
She was a half wolf and half german sheperd dog. Don was very strict in disciplinning her and would often resort to physical violence. Chinook would eventually act as if nipping back without touching skin. Don told me the dog was dangerous and would soon bite me. He took his 22 rifle and shot her, he missed and she screamed in pain. He shot her again and I ran out crying. I found her laying in her pool of blood and hugged her. Later Don put her in a garbage bag and burried her at the farm. Whenever we came close to the burial spot I would cry and that would make Don angry.
Having only been familiar (albeit briefly) with the late-sixties series which really wowed the "children" at school but turned my mother off faster'n the tee-vee pilot for THE BOYS IN THE BAND, I pretty much went into this cold. And not having seen any of the BLONDIE features from the thirties and forties I had no idea what to expect from perennial Dagwood actor Arthur Lake*, who by this time was starting to gain a middle-aged paunch perhaps due to all of those stacked sandwiches he was downing! But the guy does a really good job at bringing the famed comic strip character to the screen (both visually and with that crack-y voice that fits perfectly!) even if you can tell age is catching up with the by-now 52-year-old actor. While I'm at it Pamela Britton as Blondie's pretty hotcha herself even if those fifties dresses kinda hide the attributes every red-blooded boy was looking for. Maybe there's a revealing swimsuit episode we can look forward to out there, but otherwise it's all guess as far as juggin configuration goes just like ya hadda do with Mary Tyler Moore, and that ain't fun!
Next to red my favorite color is blue.
Southland Tales - After bombing at Cannes a year and a half ago, Richard Kelly's follow-up to Donnie Darko is finally going to be released in November. It's supposed to be totally bizarre and perhaps completely unwatchable. Of course, I'm dying to see it, if only for curiosity's sake and my personal love of The Rock. You heard me.
